EXTRAORDINARY ABILITY CRITERIA
I have provided evidence for ten out of the ten criteria of extraordinary ability: 
Evidence of receipt of lesser nationally or internationally recognized prizes or awards for excellence (Page 10-15);
Evidence of my membership in associations in the field which demand outstanding achievement of their members (Page 10-15); +
Evidence of published material about my in professional or major trade publications or other major media (Page 10-15);
Evidence that my have been asked to judge the work of others, either individually or on a panel (Page 10-15);
Evidence of my original scientific, scholarly, artistic, athletic, or business-related contributions of major significance to the field (Page 10-15);
Evidence of my authorship of scholarly articles in professional or major trade publications or other major media (Page 10-15);
Evidence that my work has been displayed at artistic exhibitions or showcases (Page 10-15);
Evidence of my performance of a leading or critical role in distinguished organizations (Page 10-15);
Evidence that my command a high salary or other significantly high remuneration in relation to others in the field (Page 10-15);
Evidence of my commercial successes in the performing arts (Page 10-15);
Comparable Evidence (Page 39-41).
EVIDENCE OF RECEIPT OF LESSER NATIONALLY OR INTERNATIONALLY RECOGNIZED PRIZES OR AWARDS FOR EXCELLENCE
Prizes or Award N1 
The petitioner is the recipient of prizes or awards
В первом разделе доказываем: был ли человек получателем призов или наград. Ничто не мешает человеку рассчитывать на командную награду, при условии, что он является одним из получателей награды. Описание этого типа доказательств в аффидевите указывает на то, что основное внимание следует уделять получению наград или призов лицом, а не получению наград или призов работодателем.
Награда может быть известна на международном или национальном уровне, может быть известна только в профессиональных кругах. Главное доказать, что за награду был конкурс, были претенденты и Клиент стал победителем.
Чтобы подтвердить получение награды Petitioner, для любого представленного приза или награды необходимо указать:  
•	Копию сертификата на каждый приз или награду; 
•	Четкую фотографию каждого приза или награды; 
•	Публичное объявление о присуждении призов или наград, выпущенное организацией, предоставляющей грант.
Чтобы показать, что призы или награды находятся в сфере деятельности получателя, пожалуйста, необходимо представить:
•	Документальное подтверждение наличия национальных или международных премий или наград, полученных за выдающиеся достижения в области деятельности бенефициара.
•	Документальное подтверждение того, по каким критериям были присуждены премии или награды; 
•	Документальное подтверждение, описывающее, как эти призы или награды связаны с областью деятельности бенефициара.
•	Документальное подтверждение следующего:
•	Значение призов или наград;
•	Кто рассматривается на соискание премий или наград;
•	Сколько призов или наград вручается ежегодно; и 
•	Предыдущие лауреаты, связанные с областью деятельности получателя.
 The award is a lesser nationally or internationally recognized prize or award which the petitioner  received for excellence in the field of endeavor
Во втором разделе доказываем: является ли награда менее значимым национальным или международным призом или наградой, которую человек получил за выдающиеся достижения в области деятельности. Как указано в простом тексте постановления, этот критерий не требует, чтобы награда или приз имели тот же уровень признания и престижа, что и Нобелевская премия или другая награда, которая могла бы считаться одноразовым достижением.
Чтобы показать, что они являются национально или международно признанными призами или наградами, необходимо представить объективные документальные свидетельства:
•	Критерии, используемые для присуждения премий или наград: 
•	Значимость премий или наград, включая национальное или международное признание, которое разделяют премии или награды.
•	Репутация организации или комиссии, присуждающей премии или награды; 
•	Кто рассматривается на соискание премий или наград, включая географический охват, в котором могут быть представлены кандидаты. 
•	Сколько премий или наград присуждается ежегодно; и 
•	Предыдущие лауреаты премий или наград.
Чтобы продемонстрировать выдающиеся достижения в области, послужившие основанием для присуждения премии или награды, заявитель может представить:
•	Объективные документальные свидетельства, описывающие, как призы или награды связаны с достижениями в сфере деятельности бенефициара; 
•	Объективные документальные доказательства критериев, использованных для присуждения премий или наград, включая доказательства того, что критерием для получения премий или наград было превосходство в данной области.
Примерами наград, отвечающих требованиям, могут быть, в частности, следующие:
Определенные награды известных национальных институтов или известных профессиональных ассоциаций;
определенные награды за докторские диссертации; и
определенные награды за презентации на национально или международно признанных конференциях.
Пояснения:
Соответствующие соображения относительно того, было ли основанием для присуждения премий или наград достижение выдающихся результатов в данной области, включают, но не ограничиваются следующим:
Критерии, используемые для присуждения наград или премий;
Национальное или международное значение премий или наград в данной области;
количество лауреатов или получателей премии; и
Ограничения для конкурентов.
Хотя многие академические награды не имеют требуемого уровня признания, могут существовать такие, которые признаны на национальном или международном уровне как награды за выдающиеся достижения, и они могут удовлетворять требованиям этого критерия.
Например, награда, доступная только лицам, проживающим в одном населенном пункте, работодателю или учебному заведению, может иметь незначительное национальное или международное признание, в то время как награда, открытая для членов известного национального учреждения (включая докторантуру в университете R1 или R2) или профессиональной организации, может быть признана на национальном уровне.
Аналогичным образом, национальное или международное признание чаще всего ассоциируется с наградами, присуждаемыми лицам самого высокого уровня в данной области. Однако нет конкретного требования, чтобы награда была открыта для всех членов области, включая самых опытных, чтобы соответствовать требованиям этого критерия. Хотя ограничения на участников могут быть важным фактором, в некоторых случаях доказательства могут установить, что награда или приз признаются на национальном или международном уровне, несмотря на то, что они ограничены молодежью, любителями или начинающими профессионалами. Например, награды, присуждаемые новым игрокам или «новобранцам» в основных спортивных лигах, могут получить национальное или даже международное освещение в СМИ.
ПРИМЕР 1:
 В марте 2024 года я была номинирована в знак признания моего вклада в сферу образования и обучения на Education 2.0 Conference Outstanding Leadership Award, которая проходила в Las Vegas, USA (Enclosed as Attachment 22 is Magazine Education 2.0 Conference, стр. 77).
Я была номинирована по всем критериям конкурса: 
· Leader's Reputation: Combining influence, commitment to ethical practices, and overall reputation, this criterion is used to judge the extent to which an individual is perceived as a trailblazer and role model in the industry.
· Achievements & Accolades: This criterion refers to examples of academic excellence, awards, publications, and dedication to lifelong learning for self-improvement and professional enrichment.
· Professional Experience: Professional experience refers to the years of industry experience and knowledge gained within public, private, or institutional sectors in various roles, projects undertaken, and work achievements.
· Creative Thinking: A demonstrated history of exhibiting exceptional creativity when confronted with challenges and driving innovations that have the potential to become standard industry practices.
· Decisive Leadership: This criterion takes into account the long-range vision of individuals in crucial management, governance, and senior leadership positions and the ability to make time-sensitive, well-informed decisions while guiding employees (Enclosed as Attachment 23 is Assessment report). 
Конференция "Education 2.0" — это международное ежегодное глобальное мероприятие, которое собирает лидеров и видных деятелей образовательного сектора со всех стран мира для обсуждения и изучения современных тенденций и инноваций в сфере глобального образования. Held in different locations such as Dubai and Las Vegas, it offers actionable insights and opportunities for collaboration among changemakers in education. With a focus on redefining the education and learning sector, it aims to unite global leaders to share their expertise and perspectives.
Конференция Education 2.0, собирающая всех выдающихся лидеров отрасли на мировой арене, самых известных педагогов, новаторов в области образовательных технологий, политиков и исследователей, переосмысливает образовательное пространство и ищет инновационные решения наиболее насущных проблем, влияющих на обучение и преподавание на глобальном уровне. Конференция стремится предоставить свою сцену лидерам образования с вдохновляющими историями, путешествиями и перспективами, а также способствовать налаживанию связей и сотрудничеству между коллегами-единомышленниками. На конференции также представляют революционные технологии, инструменты и практики, которые потенциально могут изменить будущее обучения в том виде, в котором мы его знаем (Enclosed as Attachment 24 is Article “Публикация о конференции Industry Events”, available at - https://www.industryevents.com/events/education-2-0-conference-usa-2024 ).
На конференции Education 2.0 можно встретить экспертов, узнать о K-12 digital education, подготовке учителей и руководстве в учебных заведениях, участники имеют возможность узнать много нового об образовании и предпринимательстве, безопасности и управлении данными, мерах по предотвращению мошенничества и спама против различных типов мошенничества в сфере образования, а также о других проблемах в сфере образования (Enclosed as Attachment 25 is Article “Публикация о конференции Patch News”, available at - https://patch.com/nevada/lasvegas/calendar/event/20240318/3f7a1df2-22e6-4bc7-acfb-45e6397f5150/education-2-0-conference-usa ).
Учитывая решающую роль образования в расширении прав и возможностей молодых умов, повышении качества жизни миллионов людей во всем мире и создании лучшего и светлого будущего, организаторы надеются стимулировать диалог и способствовать переменам в этом секторе.
Благодаря своей платформе конференция Education 2.0 представляет собой обогащающий и запоминающийся опыт для отдельных лиц и организаций, которые постоянно стремятся расширить границы инноваций в различных областях образования. Для участия в конференции ежегодно приглашаются и номинируются профессора университетов, школьные учителя и научные консультанты; политики и государственные чиновники. исследователи, образовательные учреждения, образовательные стартапы и инвесторы в сфере EdTech.
Номинации, в рамках которых рассматриваются лидеры сферы образования: 
Leader's Reputation: Combining influence, commitment to ethical practices, and overall reputation, this criterion is used to judge the extent to which an individual is perceived as a trailblazer and role model in the industry.
Achievements & Accolades: This criterion refers to examples of academic excellence, awards, publications, and dedication for lifelong learning for self-improvement and professional enrichment.
Professional Experience: Professional experience refers to the years of industry experience, knowledge gained within public, private, or institutional sectors in various roles, projects undertaken, and work achievements.
Creative Thinking: A demonstrated history of exhibiting exceptional creativity when confronted with challenges and driving innovations that have the potential to become standard industry practices.
Decisive Leadership: This criterion takes into account the long-range vision of individuals in crucial management, governance, and senior leadership positions and the ability to make time-sensitive, well-informed decisions while guiding employees (Смотреть Приложение 23 is Assessment report).
В марте 2024 года на церемонии награждения в Лас Вегасе, США я получила награду за выдающиеся заслуги в сфере образования и обучения (Enclosed as Attachment 26 is Награда Education 2.0 Conference, Attachment 27 is Article “Публикация о победе в номинации в Medium” - available at https://medium.com/@Education_2.0_US/anna-simonyan-recognized-with-the-outstanding-leadership-award-at-the-education-2-0-716883a7058d ).
ПРИМЕР 2. Из ответа на RFE (в первоначальном кейсе нужно писать от первого лица)
9.	The Petitioner is the recipient of three awards: 1 international and 2 nationals. We will provide evidence for each of them separately.
Lady Mail.ru Award “Best Blogger 2017”
10.	In 2017, the Petitioner became the winner of the National Award "Best Blogger" in the nomination "Fashion Goddess" according to Lady Mail.ru. The award ceremony took place on 02/27/2018. See Attachment 1 – Screenshot of the Best Blogger 2017 award ceremony.
11.	From January 18 to February 25, 2018, the second annual open voting for the best bloggers took place on Lady Mail.Ru. Opinion leaders received a total of more than 700,000 votes. For the first time, not only those selected by the editors could compete for the title of the best, but also those who nominated their own blogs. The winners were announced at a gala awards ceremony on February 28, 2018.
12.	The full version of the award ceremony is posted on the ZHIVAGOproduction YouTube channel, which can be seen by following the link https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iN-J3nNwvr4. 
13.	The most popular women's website in Russia, "Lady Mail.Ru," has been holding the "Best Blogger of the Year" award annually since 2016. Lady Mail.Ru gives everyone who deserves attention a chance to win, regardless of the number of followers. Therefore, the nominees include stars and million-follower bloggers, as well as lesser-known but equally interesting personalities. Many of them have already appeared on "Lady" in beauty shoots, given interviews, and written columns. User voting on the project takes place from mid-December to February 20-25 of the following year. The results are announced at the end of February. Voting for the "Best Bloggers on Vkontakte" category will also take place in the "Lady Mail.Ru" group. The results are tallied in the final round. 
14.	On January 18, a Press release was published on the social networking site VK, announcing voting for the best bloggers of 2017. It said
On Lady Mail.Ru, voting for the best bloggers of 2017 is starting as part of the annual awards. This year, not only those selected by the editors but also those who nominated their own blogs will compete for the title of the best. This gives young or aspiring bloggers the chance to compete with their idols, standing alongside the likes of Olga Buzova or rapper Oxxxymiron.
Any blogger with an audience of at least 15,000 followers could become a nominee by using the self-nomination feature. Lady Mail.Ru readers will choose the winners in 11 categories: "Hypojor," "Million Dollar Baby," "Beautyholik," "Fashion Goddess," "Psychology," "PP of the brain," "Yazhemat," "Eternally Departing," "Forever Hungry," "The Truth in Vine," and "Discovery of the Year." Special nominations have also been established by the Dobro Mail.Ru project, and the social networks VKontakte and Odnoklassniki (voting in these categories will also take place in the project's groups on OK and VK). Additionally, the award's organizer will vote separately in the "Lady Mail.Ru Editors' Choice" category. 
Readers of the project will be able to vote for their favorites until February 25, inclusive. For most of the time, the nominees' results can be tracked online. They will be hidden only a week before the end of the voting to prevent manipulation and maintain suspense.
The most interesting blogs will be seen by the multimillion audience of the Lady Mail.Ru project. Additionally, all winners will receive special prizes. The awards ceremony can be watched live on the Lady Mail.Ru website and in the project's social media groups. See Attachment 2 - Lady Mail.Ru readers will choose the best bloggers of the year.
15.	On December 20, 2017, an announcement for the contest "Tell the World About Your Blog and Become a Winner of the Lady Mail.Ru Award" was posted on the Lady Mail.ru website, outlining the participation conditions for the competition. 
16.	To participate in the contest, it was necessary to provide the following information:
Attach a beautiful square portrait photo. 
Briefly describe your blog (no more than 500 characters including spaces).
Specify in which category you would like to win: fashion, beauty, sports, cooking, literary criticism, or anything else you desire. Perhaps your project is so interesting that we will introduce a special category just for you.
Be sure to include links to all blog accounts on social networks (it is important that your audience is at least 15 thousand people);
And send everything together to us at lady@corp.mail.ru. Be sure to write “I want to participate in the blogger award” in the subject line of the letter.
You could nominate yourself until January 15, 2018. The decision on nomination would be made by the Lady Mail.Ru team, and participants would receive notification no later than January 20. See Attachment 3 - Tell the world about your blog and become the winner of the Lady Mail.Ru award.
17.	The Petitioner was nominated for the annual award “Best Blogger of the Year” by the editors of the Lady Mail.Ru portal, as evidenced by a letter from Fashion Editor of Lady Mail.Ru Tatyana Pyatykh dated January 22, 2018, which states the following
On behalf of the entire "Lady Mail.Ru" editorial team, we congratulate you on being nominated for the "Fashion Goddess" category in our annual blogger awards.
Here is your personal link: https://bestblogger.lady.mail.ru/nomination/fashion/#153. We would be delighted if you could tell your followers about the nomination and encourage them to vote for you (it's not prohibited) - in any convenient form: in stories, in a post, in a professional community. Currently, we are preparing a campaign to support each nominee and the entire award, so we would be pleased if you could shoot a short video for stories and send it to us (in response to this email, for example) about being our nominee now.
Please, do not plan anything for February 27; on this day, we will be awarding the winners. Details about the venue and timing of the ceremony will be coming soon. See Attachment 71 to the original petition - Letter about my nomination for the Mile Lady Best Bloggers competition.
18.	In addition, in Attachment 71, a letter from Yuliya Arbatskaya was attached to the original petition, in which she provided additional information about the Petitioner receiving the Best Blogger of the Year award:
The purpose of this letter is to provide additional information regarding ИМЯ, ФАМИЛИЯ’s receipt of the “Fashion Goddess” award by Lady.Mail.Ru.
In order to be nominated for an accolade in the annual Lady.mail.ru Best Bloggers Award, a nominee must have at least 15,000 active subscribers and correspond to a set of criteria outlined below:
1. Quality of Content: The blogger is judged on the quality and relevance of their content. As such, the blogger should deliver informative, engaging and original content that resonates with their readers.
2. Consistency: The blogger should deliver regular content that meets their readers' expectations, depending on the blogger's niche and audience.
3. Engagement: The blogger should have a community around their blog of engaged subscribers.
4. Creativity: The blogger should bring fresh and unique perspectives to their blog posts.
5. Influence: The blogger should have a significant influence on their readers and the wider community. They should be able to drive conversations and have a positive impact on their audience.
6. Design and User Experience: The blogger's website should have an attractive design and be easy to navigate. The textual accompaniment should correspond to each picture posted on the blog.
7. Innovation: The blogger should be innovative in their approach to blogging. They should demonstrate new formats, tools, and technologies and demonstrate a fresh and engaging blog overall.
8. Impact: The blogger should have a positive impact on their industry or niche. Their work should demonstrate that it is able to inspire others, create change, or make a difference in their community.
The winners are selected for the following 11 nominations:
- “Hypojor",
- "Million Dollar Baby",
- "Beautyholic",
- "Fashion Goddess",
- "Psychology",
- "PP of the brain",
- "Yazhemat",
- "Eternally Departing",
- "Forever Hungry",
- "The Truth in Vine" and
- "Discovery of the Year"
The award ceremony was broadcasted live on Lady.mail.ru website social media pages, and it was viewed by more than three million users who participated in the voting process.
A total of 411 bloggers from all over Russia previous winners were famous bloggers such as Anastasiia Ivleeva, Olga Buzova, Anton Ptushkin, Sasha Mitroshina, etc.
The Lady.mail.ru accolade has been awarded yearly to the best bloggers in the above categories since 2016.
Considering the large scale of the award, receiving an accolade in any of the above nominations is a high achievement and incredible popularity. See Attachment 71 to the original petition - Letter about my nomination for the Mile Lady Best Bloggers competition.
EVIDENCE OF MY MEMBERSHIP IN ASSOCIATIONS IN THE FIELD WHICH DEMAND OUTSTANDING ACHIEVEMENT OF THEIR MEMBERS
Title of the association
Petitioner is / was a member of the association
Для определения того, что членство бенефициара соответствует этому критерию, могут быть представлены следующие документы:
Доказательства, описывающие цели, миссию или целевое членство ассоциации.
Доказательства подтверждающие уровень известности ассоциации в данной области;
Доказательства конкретного типа членства иностранца в ассоциациях в той области, для которой запрашивается классификация;
membership requires that members have outstanding achievements in the field as judged by recognized experts in that field.
подтверждение того, что лица, рассматривающие заявления потенциальных членов, признаны национальными или международными экспертами в своих дисциплинах или областях;
Раздел устава или подзаконных актов ассоциации, в котором говорится о квалификации, предъявляемой к экспертам, входящим в состав комиссии ассоциации по рассмотрению заявлений;
Раздел устава или подзаконных актов ассоциации, в котором обсуждаются критерии членства;
требования принятия в ассоциацию, устав организации или что есть комиссия, состоящая из профессоров/экспертов, которые отбирают претендентов. 
CV или LinkedIn экспертов, которые отбирали заявителя в ассоциацию
Пояснения:
Заявитель должен продемонстрировать, что членство в ассоциации требует выдающихся достижений в области, для которой он претендует на классификацию, по мнению признанных национальных или международных экспертов.
Ассоциации могут иметь несколько уровней членства. Уровень членства, предоставляемый лицу, должен показывать, что для получения этого уровня членства признанные национальные или международные эксперты сочли это лицо достигшим выдающихся достижений в области, для которой требуется классификация.
В качестве возможного примера, общее членство в международной организации специалистов в области инженерии и технологий может не соответствовать требованиям критерия. Однако, если та же самая организация на уровне стипендиатов частично требует, чтобы кандидат имел достижения, которые, например, внесли важный вклад в развитие или применение техники, науки и технологий, и чтобы совет экспертов и комитет нынешних стипендиатов судит о номинациях на стипендии, тот более высокий уровень стипендиата может быть квалификационным.
Другой возможный квалификационный пример может включать членство в качестве стипендиата в научном обществе, занимающемся искусственным интеллектом, если членство основано на признании значительного и устойчивого вклада кандидата в область искусственного интеллекта, а группа нынешних стипендиатов осуществляет отбор новых ребята.
Соответствующие факторы, которые могут привести к выводу о том, что членство лица в ассоциации(ях) не было основано на выдающихся достижениях в этой области, включают, помимо прочего, случаи, когда членство лица основывалось исключительно на следующих факторах (сами по себе): или в совокупности):
Уровень образования или многолетний опыт работы в определенной области;
Оплата взноса или подписка на публикации ассоциации; и
Требование, обязательное или иное, для трудоустройства по определенным профессиям, которое обычно наблюдается при членстве в профсоюзе или членстве в гильдии для актеров.
ВНИМАНИЕ!!! Обязательно вставляем абзацы, если в Уставах или регламентирующих документах не прописаны условия вступления в Ассоциацию!!!
Процесс отбора кандидатов в члены Ассоциации _____________ (прописать наименование Ассоциации) включал в себя несколько этапов, чтобы обеспечить высочайшие стандарты качества и профессионализма. Кандидаты должны были подать комплексную заявку, в которой указывались их квалификация, достижения и вклад в развитие отрасли. Затем эта заявка рассматривалась отборочной комиссией, состоящей из опытных профессионалов и экспертов отрасли.
Ожидается, что кандидаты на членство в Ассоциации _______________ (прописать наименование Ассоциации) продемонстрируют исключительные таланты, навыки и достижения в области __________ (Area of expertise клиента) с акцентом на вклад в развитие _______________ (указываете сферу деятельности клиента). Они должны обладать глубоким пониманием сложных систем и иметь опыт инновационного вклада в развитие отрасли, особенно в таких областях, как электроснабжение и проекты энергетической инфраструктуры. НУЖНО АДАПТИРОВАТЬ ПОД КЛИЕНТА.
ПРИМЕР ЭТИХ АБЗАЦЕВ ДЛЯ ИНСТРУКТОРА ПО ПЛАВАНИЮ:
The candidate selection process for the International Association for the Support and Development of Early Infant Swimming involved several stages to ensure the highest standards of quality and professionalism. Candidates were required to submit a comprehensive application detailing their qualifications, achievements, and contributions to the development of the industry. This application was then reviewed by a selection committee comprised of experienced professionals and industry experts.
ПРИМЕР 1.
В июне 2016 года я была выбрана в качестве Executive member at Manitoba Council for International Education. В число членов Manitoba Council for International Education входят все основные государственные и частные учебные заведения. Каждое учреждение-член Manitoba Consul for International Education имеет активные и в большинстве случаев давние международные образовательные программы.
Manitoba Council for International Education спонсирует семинары и мастер-классы по профессиональному развитию для учреждений-членов. Регулярные заседания совета MCIE, сессии “Watercooler” и участие в специальных рабочих группах также позволяют членам делиться и обсуждать проблемы, влияющие на международное образование на местном и национальном уровне. Членство MCIE охватывает весь спектр международного образования от начального до университетского уровня.
Executive member в Manitoba Council for International Education выбирают голосованием, на котором действующие 5 членов принимают решение о принятии в должность. 
Быть приглашенным к голосованию в качестве Executive member можно за выдающиеся заслуги, в частности за многолетнее активное участие в международной образовательной индустрии. Занять пост Executive member - это значит стать “голосом” и представлять интересы более 100 учебных заведений провинции Манитоба и всю образовательную отрасль на международных мероприятиях и перед правительством Канады.
Всего в Manitoba Council for International Education 5 members, каждый из которых был принят путем голосования. Все эти люди представляют инициативы образовательной сферы правительству провинции Онтарио и на федеральном уровне. Буквально Executive members являются “голосом” образовательных учреждений, представляют и защищают их интересы перед государством (Enclosed as Attachment 28 is ANNUAL GENERAL MEETING MINUTES, 2016).
Я занимала этот пост на протяжении 4-х лет, в течение которых меня выбирали членом Manitoba Council for International Education трижды путем голосования.
В 2016 году я была выбрана в качестве секретаря и представляла Assiniboine Community College в Manitoba Council for International Education. Также я возглавляла Комитет Professional Development, готовила и презентовала на общих собраниях отчеты о профессиональном развитии (Смотреть Приложение 28 is ANNUAL GENERAL MEETING MINUTES, 2016). 
На протяжении долгого времени я входила в состав комитета International Student Awards, на заседаниях которого принимались решения о награждении студентов. Занимая пост Executive member at Manitoba Council for International Education за выдающиеся заслуги в сфере образования, я являлась членом комитета International Student Awards, where decisions regarding student awards were made during committee meetings и при принятии решений мой голос был одним из ключевых.
Занять пост члена комитета International Student Awards могут только Executive members at Manitoba Council for International Education. Члены комитета MCIE International Student Awards отбираются с учетом выдающихся заслуг в сфере образования и выполняют функции, выходящие за рамки должностных обязанностей. 
MCIE International Student Awards присуждаются иностранным студентам, демонстрирующим свои выдающиеся способности в различных сферах.
Критерии MCIE International Student Awards:
Enrolled full-time as an international student;
Actively participate in school-based and extra-curricular activities;
Maintain good academic standing;
Have a positive attitude and integrate themselves into the school and community environment;
Students cannot self-nominate (Attachment 29 is MCIE International Student Awards 2018, Attachment 30 is MCIE International Student Awards).
В Приложении 29 представлен информационный бланк-анкета для желающих принять участие в MCIE International Student Awards 2018. Этот бланк-анкета содержит в себе краткую информационную справку и поля для заполнения студентами.
В Приложении 30 представлена таблица голосования на MCIE International Student Awards 2018, в которой отражена информация об участниках конкурса (имена, школы, академическая успеваемость, дополнительные увлечения и заметки с дополнительной информацией), а также в последних пяти столбцах таблицы указаны имена членов комитета MCIE International Student Awards 2018 и их голоса. В числе членов комитета указано и мое имя - в первом столбце голосов.
Во время пленарных заседаний и дискуссий за круглым столом по обсуждению вопросов иммиграции для иностранных студентов я была ответственным фасилитатором, так как эти вопросы входят в сферу моих профессиональных интересов и свою карьеру я строю в сфере глобального партнерства и международного образования.
В 2017 году я стала председателем Professional Development Committee и на заседаниях представляла годовые отчеты о проделанной работе и всех мероприятиях, проведенных на высшем уровне (Enclosed as Attachment 31 is ANNUAL GENERAL MEETING MINUTES, 2017).
Хочу привести слова Executive Director at Manitoba Council for International Education Shelley Cure: “На посту Executive member at the Manitoba Council for International Education Анна занимала критически важную роль в формировании стратегического направления и политики организации по продвижению возможностей международного образования в Манитобе. 
Анна сотрудничала с заинтересованными сторонами для разработки программ и инициатив, которые повышают мобильность студентов, межкультурную компетентность и глобальное партнерство в образовательном секторе провинции. На Анну была возложена ответственность за укрепление отношений с местными образовательными учреждениями, государственными учреждениями и лидерами отрасли, Анна работала над созданием благоприятной среды для иностранных студентов и укреплением репутации Канады как лучшего места для глобального обучения.
Благодаря своим лидерским качествам и опыту в области международного образования, Анна вносила вклад в достижение миссии Совета, направленную на содействие межкультурному взаимопониманию и продвижению передового опыта в образовании в глобальном масштабе. 
Анна – одна из немногих талантливых специалистов в сфере глобального партнерства и международного образования, которые смогли добиться таких высоких результатов и внести значительный вклад в развитие системы образования во всем мире” (Enclosed as Attachment 32 is Рекомендательное письмо от Shelley Cure). 
ПРИМЕР 2. 
48. In 2023, the Petitioner joined The Podcast Academy, the only global professional organization for podcast creators and industry leaders. The academy's headquarters are located in London. See Attachments 56 and 57 to the original petition - Podcast Academy Membership Letter and Personal account on the Podcast Academy website.
49. Ms. Larkicheva was introduced to The Podcast Academy by Anton Maslov, who confidently attested to her talent and professionalism in audio advertising and creative production. Upon reviewing Ms. Larkicheva’s candidacy, our Committee ensured that she not only possesses outstanding technical skills but also has a deep understanding of the podcasting industry, its trends, and prospects, as the Podcast Academy admits members for outstanding achievements.
Joining the Podcast Academy is not only a well-deserved recognition of her hard work, but also an opportunity for Ms. Larkicheva to contribute to the development of the industry. I believe her involvement will be invaluable in the blogging sphere, considering her commitment to quality work and innovation.
However, as indicated in the Application checklist, admission to the Podcast Academy requires serious commitments and entails certain conditions, including the confirmation of recommendations and the provision of relevant information about one’s activities. I am confident that Ms. Larkicheva has met all the requirements expected of potential members.
In conclusion, I would like to emphasize that accepting Ms. Larkicheva as a member of the Podcast Academy is not only a well-deserved recognition of her efforts, but also a strategically important step for the Podcast Academy, considering her experience, professionalism, and passion for podcasting. See Attachment 16 - Letter of recommendation from Michelle Cobb.
50. The Podcast Academy is the only professional membership organization uniting podcast creators and industry leaders. With an inclusive approach and diverse leadership, we encourage creativity and award excellence.
51. Because they know podcasting is constantly changing, they are responsive to our members and strive to empower the people who shape the industry.
52. TPA members are part of an inclusive community of iconic and new voices defining this moment in audio.
53. Their mission is to support podcast creators and promote the cultural merits of the medium. Through programs like The Ambies, they celebrate, inspire and connect creators from around the world, and bring their work to new audiences. See Attachment 17 – About the Podcast Academy.
54.  To join the Podcast Academy, you must meet the following conditions:
✔ Get a recommendation from an Academy member. If the candidate cannot indicate the name of an Academy member, then indicate the names and email addresses of industry peers.
✔ Next, submit Link to podcast program(s) or podcast episode(s), publicly available online with appropriate credits in show notes. If credits are not listed online, provide links to episodes and include timestamps of appearance and/or credits. You can also provide a link to your Podchaser profile.
✔ You can also provide a link to your LinkedIn profile and/or a website listing roles/services
✔  For consultants with multiple clients - List of key podcast industry clients, link to LinkedIn profile and/or a website listing roles/services.
✔  For journalists who cover podcasting - Links to, or clippings of, at least 10 podcast-related articles where you are credited. See Attachment 18 - Application Checklist.
55. We have attached a letter of recommendation from Anton Maslov, an audio advertising professional and creative producer. In his letter of recommendation, he notes that
The Podcast Academy is the only professional organization that unites podcast creators and industry leaders. Joining the Podcast Academy is a challenging process that is not accessible to everyone. The Academy imposes strict requirements on candidates to maintain a high level of professionalism and creativity among its members.
Members of the Podcast Academy are part of an inclusive community consisting of iconic and emerging voices shaping the modern audio industry. The Podcast Academy’s mission is to support podcast creators and promote the cultural merits of this medium. Through programs like the Ambies, the Podcast Academy celebrates, inspires, and unites creators from around the world, attracting new audiences to their work.
It is particularly important to emphasize that the Academy encourages applications from members of diverse communities, including BIPOC, LGBTQ+, people with disabilities, immigrants, and those from underprivileged backgrounds. However, despite this inclusive approach, the entry process remains rigorous and requires significant effort and adherence to high standards.
Before starting the application process, a candidate must prepare the following materials:
A recommendation from a member of the Academy facilitates the process. In the application, it is necessary to provide the name of the Academy member or, if the candidate does not know any members, to provide the names and email addresses of industry colleagues.
Additional materials, depending on the candidate’s role, may include:
Podcasters: Links to podcast programs or episodes publicly available online, with corresponding credits in the show notes. If the credits are not listed online, candidates must provide links to the episodes and indicate the timestamps of appearances and/or credits. Additionally, a link to their Podchaser profile can be provided.
Staff Members or Consultants: Links to podcast programs or episodes available online, with specified credits and timestamps. Additionally, a link to their LinkedIn profile or a website listing their roles and services can be provided.
Consultants with Multiple Clients: A list of key podcast clients and a link to their LinkedIn profile or a website listing their roles and services.
Journalists: Links or excerpts from no fewer than 10 articles related to podcasting in which the candidate is mentioned.
Anastasiia Larkicheva has met all the requirements of The Podcast Academy and has demonstrated her qualification, dedication to the podcast industry, and outstanding achievements. Her professional skills, experience, and commitment to industry development make Anastasiia Larkicheva a valuable member of The Podcast Academy and confirm her high level of professionalism.  See Attachment 19 - Letter of recommendation from Антон Мов.
56. In addition, we have attached a letter of recommendation from Marusya Cina, author of the popular podcast, The Blueberry Podcast. Marusya Cina states in her letter of recommendation that
Being a part of the Podcast Academy is a great honor, as joining this organization requires meeting strict criteria and demonstrating a high level of professionalism. Academy members are part of an inclusive community of iconic and new voices that shape the contemporary audio landscape. The mission of the Podcast Academy is to support podcast creators and promote the cultural value of this medium. Through programs such as the Ambies, the Podcast Academy recognizes, inspires, and unites creators from around the world, attracting new audiences to their work.
Before applying for membership, candidates must prepare a series of documents, including recommendations from current Academy members or industry colleagues. It is also important to provide links to podcast programs or episodes with appropriate credits, as well as to profiles on Podchaser, LinkedIn, or other professional platforms.
Special attention is given to representatives of BIPOC, LGBTQ+ communities, people with disabilities, immigrants, and other underrepresented groups. These candidates are especially encouraged to apply, emphasizing the Academy's inclusive and diverse approach.
In conclusion, I highly recommend Ms. Larkicheva, as she takes her creativity and development in podcasting seriously.
If you would like to receive more information about Ms. Larkicheva or have questions about this letter, please do not hesitate to reach out to me via the above phone number or email. See Attachment 20 - Letter of recommendation from Маруся Чина.
The Podcast Academy requires outstanding achievements from its members, since the Petitioner possesses outstanding ability she was accepted unconditionally. Acceptance was decided by the committee for outstanding ability only.
ПРИМЕР 3.
11 июля 2014 года я вступил в Саморегулируемую организацию «Ассоциация кадастровых инженеров Поволжья» (Enclosed as Attachment 42-44 are Свидетельство о членстве в СРО, Карточка кадастрового инженера на сайте СРО, Letter of Recommendation from Savelyev). 
Для вступления в Ассоциацию кадастровых инженеров кандидаты должны соответствовать условиям, установленным законодательством Российской Федерации. 
Одним из обязательных условий наличие высшего профильного образования по одной из специальностей: «Землеустройство и кадастры», «Геодезия и дистанционное зондирование», «Картография и геоинформатика» и др.
Пройти стажировку и получить опыт в качестве помощника кадастрового инженера не менее двух лет.
После прохождения стажировки претенденту необходимо сдать теоретический экзамен. Экзамен – это тестирование с использованием автоматизированной информационной системы с целью установить наличие у кандидата необходимых навыков в области межевания и кадастровых работ, проверить знание законодательства в области кадастровой деятельности и убедиться, что будущий специалист готов к самостоятельному выполнению кадастровых работ в отношении земельных участков и объектов недвижимости.
Для профессионального развития кадастрового инженера важно постоянно обновлять свои знания и навыки, следить за изменениями в законодательстве и новыми технологиями в геодезии и картографии. Для этого можно посещать специализированные курсы, семинары и конференции, а также участвовать в профессиональных сообществах и ассоциациях. 
В мае 2019 года и июне 2022 года я проходил курсы повышения квалификации в ООО "Центр профессионального обучения и дополнительного образования "ПЕТЕРСКИЛЛС" на тему: «Актуальные вопросы законодательства в области кадастровой деятельности», продолжительностью 40 часов (Enclosed as Attachment 45 is Сведения об образовании и повышении квалификации).
Одним из условий членства в Ассоциации является отсутствие наказания в виде дисквалификации за совершение правонарушения в сфере законодательства о государственном кадастровом учете недвижимого имущества и кадастровой деятельности, предусмотренного Кодексом Российской Федерации об административных правонарушениях, в соответствии с вступившим в законную силу решением суда (Enclosed as Attachment 46 is Сведения об отсутствии судимости и дисквалификации).
Кроме того, кадастровые инженеры, члены Ассоциации периодически проходят плановую проверку деятельности, по результатам которых нарушений не выявлено (Enclosed as Attachment 47 is Результаты проверок).
EVIDENCE OF PUBLISHED MATERIAL ABOUT ME IN PROFESSIONAL OR MAJOR TRADE PUBLICATIONS OR OTHER MAJOR MEDIA 
Title of the article - date - author
Published material is related to the Petitioner  and the Petitioner 's specific work in the field for which classification is sought 
В первом разделе доказываем, связан ли опубликованный материал с человеком и его конкретной работой в области, для которой запрашивается классификация.
The publication qualifies as a professional publication, major trade publication, or major media publication
Во втором разделе доказываем, относится ли издание к категории профессионального издания, крупного отраслевого издания или крупного медийного издания.  (история издания, рейтинг, посещаемость (по количеству посетителей, градация посетителей по страновой принадлежности) и другие показатели). 
Газеты, журналы, интернет-порталы, тв в сфере деятельности Клиента и говорящие о Клиенте, берущие интервью у Кдиента, приглашающие Клиента как эксперта в сфере его деятельности. Обратите внимание, чтобы это не был ярко выраженный маркетинговый материал. В идеале использовать отраслевые СМИ.
Для того чтобы опубликованный материал соответствовал этому критерию, он должен быть в первую очередь посвящен клиенту и связан с вашей работой в данной области и, как указано в правилах, быть напечатан "в профессиональных или крупных торговых изданиях или других крупных средствах массовой информации" и "должен содержать название, дату и автора материала, а также любой необходимый перевод". Чтобы считаться крупным СМИ, публикация должна иметь значительное национальное или международное распространение. Местное издание не заслужит признания на национальном уровне. Некоторые газеты, например The New York Times, номинально обслуживают конкретный населенный пункт, но, в отличие от местных газет, могут считаться крупными СМИ, поскольку имеют значительное национальное распространение.
Чтобы помочь определить, что публикации соответствуют критериям профессиональных или крупных торговых изданий или других крупных СМИ, можно представить следующее:
Документальные доказательства, включая:
Название, дата и автор опубликованного материала;
Независимые объективные данные о тираже (онлайн и/или в печатном виде); 
Целевая аудитория издания.
Примечание: представленные доказательства должны соответствовать формату СМИ, в котором был опубликован материал. Если материал был опубликован в Интернете, доказательства должны относиться к веб-сайту. Если материал был опубликован в печатном виде, доказательства должны относиться к печатному изданию.
Чтобы помочь определить, что опубликованный материал относится к бенефициару и его и работе бенефициара в данной области, заявитель может представить:
Дополнительные опубликованные материалы, относящиеся к бенефициару и его работе в данной области.
Документальное подтверждение того, что представленный опубликованный материал касается бенефициара и его работы в данной области.
Примечания:
Дополнительные опубликованные материалы должны быть датированы до даты подачи данной формы 1-140.
Опубликованные материалы должны быть посвящены работе бенефициара в данной области, а не только работодателю бенефициара или другим организациям, с которыми бенефициар связан.
Маркетинговые материалы, созданные с целью продажи продукции бенефициара или продвижения его услуг, обычно не считаются опубликованными материалами о бенефициаре".
- Неоцененные списки в предметном указателе или сносках, или ссылки на работу бенефициара без оценки недостаточны.
Во-первых, USCIS определяет, был ли опубликованный материал связан с человеком и конкретной работой человека в области, для которой требуется классификация.
Примеры подходящих средств массовой информации могут включать, помимо прочего:
Профессиональные или крупные печатные публикации (газетные статьи, статьи в популярных и академических журналах, книги, учебники или аналогичные публикации), касающиеся человека и его работы;
Профессиональные или крупные онлайн-публикации, посвященные человеку и его работе; и
Стенограммы профессиональных или крупных аудио- или видеорепортажей о человеке и его работе.
Пояснения:
Публикуемый материал должен быть посвящен человеку и иметь отношение к его работе в данной сфере, а не только о работодателе человека и работе работодателя или другой организации и работе этой организации. 
Любые материалы, подаваемые заявителем, должны демонстрировать ценность работы и вклада человека и не должны быть сосредоточены исключительно на работодателе или организации, с которой связано это лицо. Маркетинговые материалы, созданные с целью продажи продуктов человека или продвижения услуг человека, обычно не считаются опубликованными материалами о человеке (это включает, казалось бы, объективный контент о бенефициаре в крупных печатных изданиях, за которые заплатил бенефициар или работодатель бенефициара) .
Однако человек и его творчество не обязательно должны быть единственным предметом материала; опубликованный материал, который охватывает более широкую тему, но включает существенное обсуждение работы человека в этой области и упоминает это лицо в связи с работой, может считаться материалом о человеке, относящимся к его работе.
Кроме того, офицеры могут рассматривать материалы, которые сосредоточены исключительно или в первую очередь на работе или исследовании, проводимых группой, членом которой является это лицо, при условии, что в материалах упоминается это лицо в связи с работой или другие доказательства в учетных документах значимы для этого человека. роль в работе или исследовании.
Доказательства могут включать в себя документацию, такую как печатные или онлайн-газетные или журнальные статьи, статьи в популярных или академических журналах, книги, учебники, аналогичные публикации или стенограмму профессионального или крупного аудио- или видеорепортажа о человеке и его работе.
Во-вторых, USCIS определяет, квалифицируется ли публикация как профессиональная публикация, крупное отраслевое издание или крупное издание в средствах массовой информации.
При оценке того, является ли представленная публикация профессиональной публикацией, крупным отраслевым изданием или крупным средством массовой информации, соответствующие факторы включают в себя целевую аудиторию (для профессиональных и крупных отраслевых изданий) и относительный тираж, читательскую аудиторию или зрительскую аудиторию (для крупных отраслевых изданий и других крупных отраслевых изданий). СМИ).
ВАЖНО: Редактора не пишут и не корректируют для клиента статьи перед размещением их в СМИ. Клиент самостоятельно предоставляет ссылки на ранее опубликованные статьи, а в случае решения об опубликовании новых самостоятельно ищет людей, кто этим занимается.
В данном критерий необходимо сначала указать заголовок статьи и уже потом описывается сама статья. Информацию (статистику) об источнике публикации (журнал, газета либо веб-сайт) можно найти в разделе для рекламодателей или в МедиаКите.
ПРИМЕР 1.
International Outreach
В журнале Brandon now была опубликована статья “International Outreach” обо мне на тему как сделать карьеру в старшей школе. 
Статья посвящена сфере международного образования и тем плюсам, которое оно приносит: сфера международного образования создает 81,000 рабочих мест и приносит 8 млрд долларов доходов ежегодно. Кроме этого, международное образование усиливает межкультурный обмен и глобальное взаимодействие (Enclosed as Attachment 33 is Публикация в журнале).
Интернет издание Medium, продвигающее социальную журналистику в апреле 2024 года опубликовало материал обо мне и моей победе на Education 2.0 Conference, церемония награждения проходила в Лас Вегасе, США (Смотреть Приложение 27 is Article “Публикация о победе в номинации в Medium” - available at https://medium.com/@Education_ ).
Издание Medium занимает 246-е место по популярности среди изданий в Соединенных Штатах, во всем мире 308-е место и 1-е место в сфере бизнеса и потребительских услуг. В период с декабря 2023 года до февраля 2024 года сайт издания посетило 494 миллиона человек со всего мира. Ежемесячно сайт посещают 164,6 миллионов человек. США лидирует в доле трафика, занимая 1-е место и имеют 30,24% от всех посещений (Enclosed as Attachment 34 is Article “Статистика сайта Medium” - available at https://pro.similarweb.com/#/digitalsuite/websiteanalysis/overview/website-performance/*/999/3m?webSource=Total&key=medium.com ).
ПРИМЕР 2. Из RFE
Why is vintage always in trend? Lifestyle blogger Anastasiia Lar answers
50.	In September 2021, the online magazine OOPS! published an article titled "Why is vintage always in trend? Lifestyle blogger Anastasiia Lar answers," where the Petitioner, as a guest expert, gave readers recommendations on fashion and style. See Attachment 82 to the original petition - Invitation to cooperation from OOPS magazine. 
51.	The article included the following lines: "Anastasiia is a fan of vintage clothing. On Instagram, she sincerely shares moments from her life with loved ones, and sometimes writes about psychology, gives style advice, and talks about vintage stores not only in the capital but also in major European cities. Anastasiia often travels and shares travel recommendations on her account, and she also runs the YouTube channel SEVENTEENINE. She is passionate about fashion and has collaborated with brands like UTERQUE, Gucci, Calvin Klein, Farfetch, and Garnier. She participated in a photoshoot for the Disney x Gucci clothing collection." See Attachment 83 to the original petition - Copy of the article in the OOPS magazine and site traffic analytics data.
52.	OOPS! is a brand with a 20-year history that has managed to win over millions of readers, first with its print edition and later online. In 2021, the legendary OOPS returned in a new format.
53.	Now, OOPS.ru is not just a site for girls; it's an active community providing opportunities and an environment for self-development and self-improvement. Here, you can get the latest news about celebrities and bloggers firsthand, discuss the latest fashion and beauty trends with stylists, and receive advice on relationships, healthy living, education, and careers from the best experts in the industry.
54.	The monthly audience of the magazine is more than 40,000 unique users. The main audience of the publication is women (87%) aged 18 to 25 years with an above-average income; 58% of readers live in the largest cities of Russia - Moscow (37%) and St. Petersburg (21%). See Attachment 21 – About OOPS.
55.	In addition, all articles on the OOPS site are published without attribution, and we believe that this is the site's policy. We have also attached an archive which shows that none of the articles are identified by author. See Attachment 22 - Archives of OOPS.
EVIDENCE THAT I HAVE BEEN ASKED TO JUDGE THE WORK OF OTHERS, EITHER INDIVIDUALLY OR ON A PANEL
Для доказательства этого критерия прилагаем следующие документы: 
- письмо или скриншот электронной переписки о приглашении на судейство;
- бланки проведенной экспертизы или протоколы с результатами;
программа конкурса, соревнований или другого мероприятия, где в судейской коллегии указан наш клиент, бейджи с указанием его статуса как судьи;
фотографии, где петиционер запечатлен в процессе судейства, а также на фоне баннеров с наименованием мероприятия;
рекомендательное или благодарственное письмо об участии петиционера в судействе.
ОЦЕНКА — Судья, жюри, член экспертной комиссии
Тренера довольно часто имеют судебную книгу, 
Экспертов приглашают по договорам, чтобы оценить работу других специалистов, все это является подтверждением данного критерия.
В данном случае фраза "судья" подразумевает официальное назначение на должность судьи, либо в составе коллегии, либо индивидуально, как указано в положении 8 C.F.R. § 204.5(h)(3)(iv). Независимо от широких словарных определений слов "судья" и "работа", окончательное решение о том, соответствует ли доказательство простым требованиям нормативного акта, остается за USCIS. См. Matter of Caron International, 19 I&N Dec. 791, 795 (Comm'r 1988) (постановление о том, что надлежащим органом для определения соответствия требованиям является USCIS). Первоначальные доказательства должны продемонстрировать, что бенефициар "признан в области экспертизы", поэтому положение не может быть истолковано как включающее евеий неформальный случай оценки подчиненных сотрудников или продукции.
Документы, которые помогут нам определить, работал ли бенефициар в качестве судьи и на каком уровне, например, независимые и объективные документы о событии или случае, когда он выступал в качестве судьи, о работе, которая оценивалась, об уровне участников, о том, как он был выбран в качестве официального судьи, и свидетельства о том, когда происходило судейство.
USCIS определяет, выступал ли человек в качестве судьи работы других лиц в той же или смежной области специализации.
Примеры оценки работы других могут включать, помимо прочего:
Рецензирование научного журнала, о чем свидетельствует просьба журнала к лицу провести рецензию, сопровождаемая доказательством того, что рецензия действительно была завершена;
Рецензирование тезисов или статей, представленных для презентации на научных конференциях в соответствующей области;
Работая в качестве члена доктора философии. диссертационный комитет, который выносит окончательное решение о том, соответствует ли работа кандидата требованиям для получения докторской степени, что подтверждается ведомственными записями; и
Рецензент государственных программ финансирования исследований.
Пояснения:
Заявитель должен доказать, что это лицо не только было приглашено для оценки работы других лиц, но также и то, что оно действительно участвовало в оценке работы других лиц в той же или смежной области специализации. Например, заявитель может документировать работу этого человека по рецензированию, предоставив ему копию запроса из журнала на проведение рецензии, сопровождаемую доказательствами, подтверждающими, что человек действительно завершил рецензию.
Обращаем внимание, что оценка работы других людей или рецензирование должно быть на БЕЗВОЗМЕЗДНОЙ основе.
Если у Клиента нет судейства, то он может сделать, то есть клиент может обратиться в свой Университет и взять дипломные работы либо диссертации для рецензии. 
Критерий по судейству в бьюти-индустрии
Конкурс мастеров типа BEAUTY BATTLE на лучшую стрижку/окрашивание/маникюр. Участники мастера и клиенты в команде, условиями могут быть: выложить фотографию выполненной услуги и запустить голосование в соцсетях
Ассоциации проводят конференции, организаторами могут быть продавцы расходных материалов, в рамках рекламы
ПРИМЕР 1.
The Petitioner является судьей 3 категории с 10 января 2019 года в соответствии с приказом Краснодарской краевой общественной организации Спортивная Федерация плавания, история присвоения категории, которой указывается в списке спортивных судей, подтвердивших квалификационную судейскую категорию «Спортивный судья третьей категории». 
Мы прилагаем приказ Об утверждении протокола аттестационной комиссии №7 от 12 февраля 2021 года, в котором приводится Список спортивных судей, подтвердивших квалификационную судейскую категорию «Спортивный судья третьей категории», в котором указано имя the Petitioner, в числе спортивных судей 3 категории. See Attachment 10 – Приказ Об утверждении протокола аттестационной комиссии.
Кроме того, the Petitioner входит в Список судей города Екатеринбурга по плаванию по приказу и утверждению Федерации плавания города Екатеринбурга, в качестве спортивной судьи 3 категории. See Attachment 11 – Список судей города Екатеринбурга по плаванию по приказу и утверждению Федерации плавания города Екатеринбурга, в качестве спортивной судьи 3 категории.
Деятельность спортивных судей в Российской Федерации осуществляется в соответствии с Положением о спортивных судьях, утвержденным приказом Минспорта России от 28 февраля 2017 г. № 134.
Положение о спортивных судьях устанавливает порядок присвоения, лишения, восстановления квалификационных категорий спортивных судей и содержание квалификационных требований к кандидатам на присвоение данных категорий, а также права и обязанности спортивных судей.
В Российской Федерации устанавливаются следующие квалификационные категории спортивных судей:
а) спортивный судья всероссийской категории;
б) спортивный судья первой категории;
в) спортивный судья второй категории;
г) спортивный судья третьей категории;
д) юный спортивный судья.
В соответствии с пунктом 24 Положения о спортивных судьях Квалификационная категория спортивного судьи «спортивный судья третьей категории» (далее – третья категория) присваивается кандидатам, достигшим возраста 16 лет, после выполнения требований к сдаче квалификационного зачета (экзамена).
Вторая и третья категория присваиваются органами местного самоуправления муниципальных районов и городских округов (далее – органы местного самоуправления) по месту территориальной сферы деятельности региональной спортивной федерации по Представлению, заверенному печатью (при наличии) и подписью руководителя региональной спортивной федерации (за исключением военно-прикладных и служебно-прикладных видов спорта). 
Вторая и третья категория присваиваются подразделениями федеральных органов по месту их нахождения по Представлению, подписанному должностным лицом, уполномоченным подразделением федерального органа (далее – должностное лицо) (для военно-прикладных и служебно-прикладных видов спорта). See Attachment 12 – Положение о спортивных судьях. 
В соответствии Квалификационные требования к спортивным судьям по виду спорта «плавание», утвержденным приказом Министерства спорта Российской Федерации от «19» февраля 2020 г. № 150 для присвоения 3 Категории судейства необходимо выполнить требования к сдаче квалификационного зачета без выполнения требований к прохождению практики судейства. See Attachment 13 - Квалификационные требования к спортивным судьям по виду спорта «плавание».
Для допуска к сдаче квалификационного зачета (экзамена) требуется прослушать соответствующий теоретический курс по Правилам. Органом, ответственным за проведение квалификационного зачета (экзамена) и формирование тестовых вопросов (экзаменационных билетов), является Коллегия спортивных судей региональной спортивной федерации по виду спорта "плавание". Для успешной сдачи требуется правильно ответить на более 60% вопросов соответствующей сложности. Квалификационный зачет (экзамен) проходит ежегодно. See Attachment 14 – Требования к сдаче квалификационного зачета (экзамена) для присвоения (подтверждения) квалификационной категории спортивного судьи.
Мы приложили Итоговый протокол Первенства города Екатеринбурга по плаванию "Весёлый дельфин" юноши 12-13 лет (2009 - 2010 г.р.), девушки 10-11 лет (2011- 2012 г.р.), который проходил с 10 февраля по 12 февраля 2018 года. The Petitioner осуществляла судейство данного Первенства. 
В Первенстве города Екатеринбурга по плаванию "Весёлый дельфин" юноши 12-13 лет (2009 - 2010 г.р.), девушки 10-11 лет (2011- 2012 г.р.) приняло участие около 293 юношей и девушек. See Attachment 15 – Итоговый протокол Первенства города Екатеринбурга по плаванию "Весёлый дельфин".
Также the Petitioner осуществляла судейство на Городских соревнованиях по плаванию среди юношей 13-14 лет (2009 - 2010 г.р.) и девушек 11-12 лет (2011- 2012 г.р.), организованных Федерацией плавания города Екатеринбурга, 20.10 - 22.10.2018 года. На Городских соревнованиях по плаванию среди юношей 13-14 лет (2009 - 2010 г.р.) и девушек 11-12 лет (2011- 2012 г.р.). приняло участие 349 юношей и девушек. See Attachment 16 – Итоговый протокол Городских соревнований по плаванию юноши.
Вместе с тем, the Petitioner осуществляла судейство на Чемпионате Краснодарского края по плаванию, организованного Краснодарской краевой общественной организацией «Спортивная федерация плавания», в городе Кропоткин 8-11 февраля 2022 года. На данном Чемпионате приняло участие 760 юношей и девушек. See Attachment 17 – Итоговый протокол Чемпионата Краснодарского края по плаванию.
Краснодарская краевая общественная организация «Спортивная федерация плавания» (Федерация), является основанным на членстве общественным объединением, которое создано в целях защиты общих интересов членов Федерации и достижения уставных целей.
Федерация аккредитована министерством физической культуры и спорта Краснодарского края и наделена статусом региональной спортивной федерации по виду спорта «Плавание».
Мы приложили Регламент проведения Чемпионата Краснодарского края по плаванию, согласно которому Чемпионат Краснодарского края (далее - Соревнования) - соревнования уровня субъекта Российской Федерации. 
Краевые соревнования проводятся в соответствии с: 
Федеральным законом от 4 декабря 2007 года № 329-ФЗ «О физической культуре и спорте в Российской Федерации»; 
постановлением Правительства Российской Федерации от 18 апреля 2014 года№ 353 «Об утверждении правил обеспечения безопасности при проведении официальных спортивных соревнований»; 
правилами вида спорта «плавание», утвержденными приказом Министерства спорта Российской Федерации от 17 августа 2018 года № 728; 
квалификационными требованиями к спортивным судьям по виду спорта «плавание», утверждёнными приказом Министерства спорта Российской Федерации от 19 февраля 2020 года № 150; 
приказом министерства здравоохранения Российской Федерации от 23 октября 2020 года № 1144-Н «Об утверждении порядка организации оказания медицинской помощи лицам, занимающимся физической культурой и спортом (в том числе при подготовке и проведении физкультурных мероприятий и спортивных мероприятий), включая порядок медицинского осмотра лиц, желающих пройти спортивную подготовку, заниматься физической культурой и спортом в организациях и (или) выполнить нормативы испытаний (тестов) Всероссийского физкультурно-спортивного комплекса «Готов к труду и обороне» и форм медицинских заключений о допуске к участию в физкультурных и спортивных мероприятиях;
календарным планом официальных физкультурных мероприятий и спортивных мероприятий Краснодарского края на 2022 год; 
постановлением главы администрации (губернатора) Краснодарского края от 13 марта 2020 г. № 129 «О введении режима повышенной готовности на территории Краснодарского края и мерах по предотвращению распространения новой коронавирусной инфекции (COVID-19)» (с изменениями и дополнениями); 
приказом министерства физической культуры и спорта Краснодарского края от 30 декабря 2019 года № 1743 «Об организации и проведении региональных официальных физкультурных мероприятий и спортивных мероприятий и межмуниципальных официальных физкультурных мероприятий и спортивных мероприятий, а также проведении спортивных мероприятий по национальным видам спорта»; 
приказом министерства физической культуры и спорта Краснодарского края от 02.07.2019 г. № 888 «Об организации и проведении межмуниципальных и региональных физкультурных мероприятий и спортивных мероприятий на территории Краснодарского края»; 
порядком назначения спортивных судей по виду спорта «плавание», обслуживающих официальные соревнования регионального, межмуниципального и муниципального уровней, утвержденного решением Президиума ККОО «Спортивная федерация плавания» (протокол № 4 от 18 ноября 2016 года). 
Настоящее положение регулирует вопросы, связанные с организацией и проведением спортивных мероприятий по плаванию на территории Краснодарского края, а также утверждением порядков, сроков и условий определения составов судейских коллегий (включая главные судейские коллегии) краевых соревнований и является основанием для командирования муниципальными образованиями Краснодарского края на краевые соревнования участников соревнований - спортсменов, представителей, тренеров и судей.
Соревнования являются отборочными для формирования спортивной сборной команды Краснодарского края по плаванию для участия в чемпионате Южного федерального округа (бассейн 50 м) и отборочных соревнованиях Кубка России по плаванию (бассейн 50 метров). 
В отборе на чемпионат Южного федерального округа по плаванию и отборочных соревнованиях Кубка России по плаванию принимают участие только спортсмены, входящие в состав спортивных сборных команд муниципальных образований Краснодарского края.
Соревнования проводятся в соответствии с Правилами вида спорта «плавание», утвержденными приказом Министерства спорта Российской Федерации от 17 августа 2018 г. №728.
К участию в Соревнованиях допускаются спортсмены в составе спортивных сборных команд муниципальных образований Краснодарского края в следующих возрастных группах: мужчины 2007 г.р. и старше; женщины 2009 г.p. и старше. Число участников Чемпионата составило 760 человек. See Attachment 18 - Регламент проведения Чемпионата Краснодарского края по плаванию.
ПРИМЕР 2 
In June 2023, the Petitioner was invited as a judge for the Music Box Golden Hit National Music Award, the finalists of which are determined by audience voting on social networks and on the official website of the Music Box channel.
National Award "Golden Hit" - an award in the field of music, art and PR communications. The “Golden Hit” award has an International level. 
The prize annually rewards the best Russian and foreign pop performers, leading cultural and PR figures, agencies and projects. 
The award jury conducts a competitive selection and determines finalists in 40 categories. 
The ceremony is supported by the Music Box TV channel, which has an audience of more than five million viewers worldwide. See Attachment 31 - About the Music Box Golden Hit award.
Russian “Music Box” is a Russian music channel broadcasting since 2004. Since a large-scale rebranding in 2019, the channel has shown positive dynamics in television viewing.
The backbone of the channel's music broadcasting consists of current foreign and Russian music videos, which are aired as part of thematic music blocks and music charts. At any time of day or night, only undeniable hits from the 2000s to the present day, as well as the most current releases, are featured on our channel. The television broadcast is supplemented by in-house produced programs. 
Broadcasting in Full HD format allows us to offer the best picture and sound quality on Russian music television. In this format, the channel is available in the largest cable networks in Russia and abroad (CIS and Baltic countries, Germany, Israel) and in hotels in popular resorts in Turkey, Egypt, Spain and the UAE. The channel broadcasts in SD format on the Yamal-401 satellite. See Attachment 32 – About Russian Music Box.
We have also attached the REGULATIONS for the competition for the annual national television award in the field of popular music “Music Box Gold Award” dated January 19, 2019. The Regulations determine the goals, regulations and procedure for conducting the Competition for the Music Box Gold Award. See Attachment 33 – REGULATIONS on the competition for the annual national television award in the field of popular music “Music Box Gold Award”.
The competition is held every calendar year to identify the best representatives of the music industry, show business and media sphere.
The Prize is a professional award and is awarded to the Laureates who won the Competition based on the results of voting by the Jury and Spectators in the manner established by these Regulations.
The Jury is a body formed by the Organizing Committee in each calendar year before the Competition for the duration of the Competition, and operates on an absentee basis. The composition of the Jury is approved by the Organizer, based on trends in the media industry, music industry and show business.
The Jury consists of highly qualified representatives of the show business and advertising industry, appointed to award awards at the Awards and capable of objectively and competently examining the performances of the Nominees.
Members of the Jury carry out a professional analysis of the performances presented for the Prize, give them an impartial assessment and select the winners.
The jury participates in voting at the First and Second stages of the Competition. 
Members of the Jury participate in public events aimed at popularizing the Competition, organized by the Organizing Committee. 
Members of the Jury have the right to make recommendations on how to improve the procedure for conducting the Competition, taking into account popular trends.
The mandatory requirements for participation in the Jury are as follows:
For the music industry jury, individuals must meet at least two of the following criteria:
possession of professional knowledge and skills, as well as outstanding achievements in the music industry and show business;
recommendation from one or more members of the Award Organizing Committee;
holders of awards such as GRAMMY, BMI, MTV Europe Music Award, and other significant awards.
The mandatory requirements for participation in the Media Industry Jury are as follows (at least two):
 experience in the media industry for more than five years;
recommendation from one or more members of the Award Organizing Committee;
possession of professional knowledge and skills, as well as outstanding achievements in the media industry;
position in the agency: "Creative Director" and/or "Managing Director" and/or
“General Director” and/or “Deputy General Director” and/or
“Strategic Director” and/or “Head of Department/Company” and/or position related to the development of advertising campaign strategies;
position in advertising-related media not below the editor level.
The determination of Laureates occurs in 3 (three) stages: 
First stage: Formation of Long-list and Short-list. At the first stage, on the date of the first intermediate event (Press Breakfast), the Organizer sends the Jury a list of potential Contest Nominees for each Nomination (Long-list). The Organizing Committee sends the Jury a link with a voting form for each Nomination in electronic form. The Jury members work remotely through closed voting for the Contest Nominees within the deadlines set by the Organizing Committee. Based on the results of the Jury voting, Short-lists of Nominees are formed for each Nomination. In each Nomination, the Short-list may consist of no more than 10 (Ten) Nominees. The counting of the Jury's voting results is conducted by the Organizing Committee.
Second stage: Audience voting and Jury voting. In the second stage, after the announcement of the Nominees based on the results of the First stage, open audience voting is announced based on the received Short-lists. Audience voting is announced at the second intermediate event (Gala Dinner) and takes place on the Official Contest Website. At the same time, a repeat closed voting by the Jury for the Nominees from the Short-list formed based on the results of the First stage is conducted. The Organizing Committee sends the Jury members a link with a voting form for each Nomination in electronic form. The Jury members work remotely through closed voting. The deadlines for conducting audience voting and Jury voting to determine the Laureate in each Nomination are established by the Organizing Committee and published on the Official Contest Website.
Third stage. Signing the protocol. At the third stage, votes are counted for the title of the Prize laureate identified as a result of the Second Stage of the Competition.
The Prize Laureate in each of the Nominations is determined by adding the results of the audience voting and the results of the Jury voting at the Second Stage in percentage terms according to the following formula:
Result of the Jury voting (in % for each Nominee) + Result of the Audience voting (in % for each Nominee) = Final result of the Competition in relation to each Nominee.
The Laureate of the Competition is the Nominee who received the largest percentage of votes based on the results of adding the results of the Jury voting and the Audience voting in the manner prescribed by this paragraph.
The results of each stage of the Competition are reflected in the Protocol of vote counting and determination of the Competition Laureate. The protocol is signed by the Competition Organizer.
The results established in the protocol are secret and are not subject to disclosure until the Award Ceremony. See Attachment 33 – REGULATIONS on the competition for the annual national television award in the field of popular music “Music Box Gold Award”.
The jury members of Golden Hit 2023 were:
Igor Krutoy – Composer and singer, People's Artist of Russia (1996), People's Artist of Ukraine (2011), Honored Artist of the Russian Federation (1992). Owner of the production company "ARS" (producing projects such as "New Wave," "Song of the Year," "Morning Post"), independent copyright agency (NAA), Music TV channel (25%), radio stations "Love Radio," "Radio Dacha," and "Taxi-FM," music producer of "Star Factory-4." Awarded the Order "For Services to the Fatherland" 4th degree (July 28, 2009), as well as the "Order of Friendship" (2004).
Maxim Fadeev – Russian music producer, arranger, performer, and songwriter, composer, music video director. Known as the creator of the successful label MALFA and the person who promoted singers Linda, Yulia Savicheva, Nargiz, the group "Serebro," and others.
Filipp Kirkorov – People's Artist of the Russian Federation, composer, producer. Honored Artist of the Autonomous Republic of Crimea (August 27, 2000), Honored Artist of the Russian Federation (January 19, 2001), People's Artist of Ingushetia (2006), People's Artist of the Chechen Republic (2006), People's Artist of the Russian Federation (February 12, 2008), People's Artist of Ukraine (May 29, 2008), People's Artist of Moldova (June 10, 2018), special award from the President of Belarus "Through Art - to Peace and Understanding" (July 16, 2020). Also, Filipp Kirkorov is an eight-time winner of the "Ovation" award, a five-time winner of the World Music Awards as the most popular performer in Russia, a multiple winner of the "Golden Gramophone" award, "Hundred Percent Hit," and a laureate of the annual "Song of the Year" festival.
Natalia Palinova – General Director of Music Box Gold, Academician of the Russian National Victoria Prize, Public figure.
Anastasiia Larkicheva – Social blogger, YouTube & Instagram blogger.
Arusya Amaryan – Producer of Music Box channel. Having worked for 13 years in the TV and show business sphere, she has implemented over 150 projects across Russia and around the world. Numerous high-profile concerts, events, TV shows, music videos, etc.
Yana Rudkovskaya – Russian TV presenter, music producer. She is among the TOP-3 most stylish and successful business ladies of the Russian show business; the general producer of the academy of cinema and show business "STARS" and the internet portal about quality of life www.posta-magazine.ru; included in the TOP ratings "TNS Gallup Media" with her, one of the most successful in the Russian show business, business projects; the winner of the "Soundtrack" Award in the nomination "Producer of the Year" - 2007, 2008, 2010; "Person of the Year" - 2009; winner of the Fashion TV channel award as the most stylish producer - 2007, 2008, 2009, 2010, 2011, 2012; winner of the "Most Stylish Couple of the Year" award (together with Evgeni Plushenko) according to Glamour magazine (2009) and Hello (2010); "Bohemian Chic" Hello (2011), Glamour award (2007) in the nomination "The most stylish business woman of the year."
Eugenia Zinovieva – Top, professional certified makeup artist, founder of the beauty studio "Kudri_Brovi."
Alina Arts – Russian pop singer, TV presenter, actress, writer. Since 2016, she has been the editor-in-chief of the music TV channel Europa Plus TV, and from 2018 to May 2020, she was its general director, in May 2020, she was appointed president of the Europa Plus TV channel. Since 2012, Alina Arts has been the musical ambassador of the Europa Plus TV channel at the world-famous American Billboard Music Awards Ceremony. Alina Arts is the only TV presenter in Russia who annually reports from the heart of Las Vegas: from the Red Carpet of the famous MGM Grand Garden Arena, where this bright and spectacular music awards ceremony takes place.
Ruslan Prokhorov – Owner of Newscopter and "MI STYLE'' companies, as well as one of the most famous operators in Russia engaged in aerial photography. In 2021, Ruslan received the prestigious Annual International Prize in Economics and Finance named after P.A. Stolypin in the nomination "For the best invention for aerial photography." We are talking about the development itself - the DJI OSMO system. In 2022, Ruslan again became the laureate of this prize and won the award in the nomination "For contribution to television and video production." In 2023, Ruslan received the Fashion summer awards for the popular Fashion TV channel in the nomination "Best aerial photography director." Also, in 2023, Ruslan won the Melon Rich Awards. This significant award is given for various merits in the field of business. Ruslan took the award in the nomination "Best online school for remote professions." In 2012, Ruslan shot a video for Porsche with the legendary Porsche 911 T Coupe 1971. The video became the winner of the Porsche Classic competition "On the Roads Challenge '' and brought Ruslan honor and fame among all official dealers and partners of Porsche Classic worldwide.
Alena Shikhova – Star fashion designer. For three consecutive years, from 2017 to 2019, Alena Shikhova received awards in three different nominations at the "Woman of the Year" awards - "Dream of the Year," "Style of the Year," and "Designer of the Year." Alena Shikhova also demonstrated her talent and professionalism by winning the "Fashion Day" designer competition with the autumn-winter 2020 collection. A finalist of the "Most Fashionable" Awards 2020 in the nomination "Best Business Lady," Alena Shikhova demonstrates her professionalism and recognition in the fashion industry as a successful business lady.
Iosif Prigozhin – Russian music producer, businessman. In 1998, he was awarded the "Ovation" award as the best "Producer of the Year." In the same year, the magazine "Company" recognized him as the "Best businessman" of the year in the show business field. Holder of the Medal "For Services to the Chechen Republic" (April 2, 2019). Member of the Association of Music Producers, Doctor of Arts of the Academy of Alternative Sciences. In 2019, he received the "MUZ-TV" channel award in the nomination "Best producer of the decade." See Attachment 34 - Poster indicating the jury members of the National Music Award "Golden Hit".
The Petitioner was invited to the judging panel of the event as a popular blogger and evaluated the contestants based on the following criteria:
Musical quality;
Lyrics and musical composition;
Popularity and influence;
Popularity on the Internet;
Critical recognition and commercial success.
As part of a competent jury consisting of professionals in the fields of music, production, and blogging, the Petitioner participated in determining the winners in each category. The award ceremony took place at the "Gradsky Hall" concert hall and was accompanied by a show featuring nominees and invited stars. 
The Petitioner has a Certificate from Music Box Gold, signed by the General Director of the Music Box TV channel N.V. Palinova. The Certificate states that
The certificate is awarded to Anastasiia Lar.
For her work as a jury member of the 2023 Music Box Golden Hit award. Thanks to your professionalism and high competence in the field of blogging, the best specialists in this category were recognized in the nominations, and the strongest was awarded the prize. 
We thank you for your participation and contribution to the development of the National Music Box Golden Hit Award. See Attachment 79 to the original petition - Certificate for work in the jury of the National Music Award Golden Hit and 
In addition, we have attached a letter of recommendation from Natalia Palinova, CEO at Music Box Russia, who also confirms that
For the past 10 years, our media holding has annually organized a large-scale and prestigious event - the presentation of the National Music Award "Golden Hit." The National Award "Golden Hit" has already become a tradition for the music community of Russia. Every year, it awards the best performers and compositions for outstanding achievements in the field of music. Participants of the award - from popular singers to young and talented musicians - strive to receive this prestigious award, which has become a symbol of success in the domestic music industry.
…. Перечисление судей с указанием их достижений
That's why Anastasiia Lar was invited to join the jury of the National Music Award "Golden Hit" in 2023, contributing significantly both personally and professionally to the successful implementation of this massive project. Thanks to her experience and high competence in the field of blogging, the best specialists in this category were nominated, and the most outstanding ones received well-deserved awards. See Attachment 35 – Letter of Recommendation from Natalia Palinova.
This contest is of great importance for bloggers all over the country. It not only stimulates the development of blogging as a field, but also contributes to strengthening the independence of the media. Participation in such a contest provides bloggers with an opportunity to showcase their talents and achievements, which stimulates their professional growth and audience expansion. The contest creates a space for the exchange of ideas and experiences, which contributes to the overall improvement of the quality of content in the blogosphere.
In addition, the contest plays an important role in strengthening media independence. At a time when freedom of speech and independent journalism are becoming increasingly important, such events support the creation of quality and objective content. This is particularly important for society, as it allows access to diverse and reliable information.
For the Petitioner, participating as a judge in this competition is especially meaningful, as it is in her direct sphere of activity. By judging the entries, she not only contributes to the development of blogging, but also maintains high standards of quality and independence in the media industry. This experience allows her to keep abreast of the latest trends and innovations in blogging, which strengthens her professional competencies and credibility in the community.
EVIDENCE OF MY ORIGINAL SCIENTIFIC, SCHOLARLY, ARTISTIC, ATHLETIC, OR BUSINESS-RELATED CONTRIBUTIONS OF MAJOR SIGNIFICANCE TO THE FIELD
В первом разделе доказываем, внес ли человек оригинальный вклад в данную область.
Во втором разделе доказываем,  имеет ли оригинальный вклад большое значение для данной области.
Вклад в развитие спорта, нации, экономики, предприятия…Подтвердить это можно патентами, разработками, мнением других экспертов. Например, хореограф по чукотским танцам. Хореограф занимался с детьми, участвовал в различных конкурсах и привозил в страну грамоты и призы. Такой хореограф получил грамоту от правительства (от областного комитета) за вклад в культуру области.
Ученые, кандидаты наук чаще всего пишут свои научные труды о чем-то новом, что даст развитие в определенной сфере. Идеальный вариант, когда научный труд используется на практике и дает результаты.
Чтобы помочь определить, является ли вклад бенефициара оригинальным и значимым в данной области, заявитель может представить:
 Объективные документальные доказательства значимости вклада бенефициара в данную область.
Документальное подтверждение того, что люди в данной области в настоящее время считают работу бенефициара важной.
Свидетельства и/или письма поддержки от экспертов, в которых обсуждается значительный вклад бенефициара.
Доказательства того, что значительный вклад (вклады) бенефициара вызвал широкие общественные комментарии в данной области или был широко процитирован.
Доказательства того, что работа бенефициара была реализована другими. Возможные доказательства могут включать, но не ограничиваться ими:
контракты с компаниями, использующими продукцию бенефициара; лицензионные технологии, используемые другими;
о патентах, используемых в настоящее время и доказавших свою значимость для данной области.
Примечание: Письма и свидетельства, если они подаются, должны содержать как можно больше подробностей о вкладе бенефициара и подробно объяснять, каким образом вклад был "оригинальным" (не просто повторение работы других) и какое значение он имел. Общие заявления о важности начинаний, не подкрепленные документальными доказательствами, недостаточны.
Примеры соответствующих доказательств включают, помимо прочего:
Публикуемые материалы о значении оригинального творчества человека;
Отзывы, письма и письменные показания об оригинальной работе человека;
Документация о том, что оригинальная работа человека цитировалась на уровне, указывающем на большую значимость в данной области; и
Патенты или лицензии, полученные на основе работы человека, или свидетельства коммерческого использования работы человека.
Пояснения:
Анализ по этому критерию фокусируется на том, представляет ли оригинальная работа человека значительный и значительный вклад в эту область.
Доказательства того, что работа человека была профинансирована, запатентована или опубликована, хотя и потенциально демонстрируют оригинальность работы, сами по себе не обязательно доказывают, что работа имеет важное значение для данной области.
Например, опубликованное исследование, вызвавшее широкое обсуждение его важности со стороны других специалистов в этой области, а также документация, которая получила высокую оценку по сравнению с работами других специалистов в этой области, могут служить доказательством значимости вклада человека в эту область. усилий.
Аналогичным образом, доказательства того, что лицо разработало запатентованную технологию, которая привлекла значительное внимание или коммерциализацию, могут установить значимость первоначального вклада человека в эту область. Если патент остается на рассмотрении, USCIS обычно требует дополнительных подтверждающих доказательств, подтверждающих оригинальность вклада человека, таких как подробные рекомендательные письма.
Подробные письма экспертов в этой области, объясняющие характер и значимость вклада человека, также могут обеспечить ценный контекст для оценки заявленного первоначального вклада, имеющего большое значение, особенно когда запись включает документацию, подтверждающую заявленную значимость.
Представленные письма должны конкретно описывать вклад человека и его значение в данной области, а также должны излагать основу знаний и опыта автора.
ПРИМЕР 1 
Оригинальный вклад the Petitioner в качестве Legal Assistant заключается в нескольких ключевых аспектах:
Инновации в юридической практике: The Petitioner осуществлен введение новых методов работы, технологий и подходов в юридической деятельности. Это включало использование современных технологий для анализа юридических документов, разработку новых стратегий ведения дел.
Законодательные инициативы: Разработка и продвижение новых законопроектов, которые впоследствии принимаются и становятся частью правовой системы. The Petitioner принимал участие в реформировании существующих нормативных документов, который изменил правовой ландшафт в области государственных закупок, а также разработал инструкции и антикоррупционную политику компании.
We will look at each aspect separately. 
Инновации в юридической практике
В феврале 2015 года он занял должность старшего юриста в "Независимой адвокатской группе". В основном клиенты компании были крупными – это были почтовые и коллекторские компании, а также частные лица, чьи судебные дела и документация находились под тщательным контролем. Юридическая практика компании была структурирована на три группы: первая группа состояла из специалистов, участвующих в судебных процессах и ведущих соответствующую документацию; вторая группа занималась корпоративными вопросами внутреннего характера; третья группа фокусировалась на решении сложных дел. 
Как старший юрист, он курировал все группы, организовывал их работу, занимался аналитикой и давал указания сотрудникам. Его стремление упростить и автоматизировать рабочие процессы привело к значительным инновациям в юридической практике компании. Вместе с руководителем и частными судебными приставами он разработал систему, которая ускорила и сделала более эффективным выполнение различных задач. Эта система охватывала весь процесс, начиная с покупки портфеля у банка, обработки должников, подачи заявлений в суд и исполнительного производства, и заканчивая заключением медиативных соглашений. 
Эти нововведения позволили компании работать более слаженно и результативно, ставя все процессы "на поток". Его подход к инновациям и оптимизации рабочих процессов сыграл ключевую роль в достижении значительных успехов компании.
О вкладе и роли the Petitioner в качестве старшего юриста в рекомендательных письмах поделились руководство его компании и коллеги. 
Например, Yerzhan Molda, General Director of the law firm "Independent Lawyers Group утверждает, что
He particularly stood out to me for his role in resolving a contentious property division issue during a conflict between a group of shareholders of one of our clients. The situation was complex, as the dispute was being considered by the London Court of Arbitration. However, Turar, with his talent for quickly analyzing foreign legislation and his strong command of the English language, managed to resolve this issue by facilitating a settlement agreement between all parties. As a result, the shareholders withdrew all previously filed lawsuits, numerous amounts of paid state fees were refunded, bank accounts were unfrozen, work processes resumed, and employee salaries were paid. Consequently, many companies of these shareholders signed contracts with us for further legal support. In 2015, our client base increased by 25%.
Turar Syd's contribution was obvious from the very beginning. He not only met my expectations, but exceeded them in many ways. He established the structure of work of the pretentious claims department with the courts of the Republic of Kazakhstan and private bailiffs, which made it possible to timely process large volumes of work on carrying out claims proceedings. As a result, in 2015, the volume of debt collection and return of funds to microcredit organizations and collection agencies increased by 300%. See Attachment 1 – Letter of recommendation from Yerzhan Molda.
Kamil Mar, Председатель коллегии адвокатов Алматинской области Республики Казахстан, отмечает
One of the cases Turar was involved in was a land dispute in the Almaty region. This case was very complex and high-profile, involving dozens of individuals as well as government agencies. Besides the civil dispute, there were also criminal offenses committed by individuals and officials. The evidence collected and the legal position presented by Turar allowed us to successfully appeal our client's case, resulting in the overturning of a previously unfavorable decision. As a result, our client had land plots valued at a total of $1,200,000 returned to them. Additionally, unlawfully issued resolutions by law enforcement agencies were revoked. See Attachment 2 – Letter of recommendation from Kamil Mar.
In a recommendation letter, Olesya Ima, President of Ridder TPP JSC отмечает:
During his tenure, he made invaluable contributions. For example, he implemented the transition from paper-based procurement to modern electronic trading platforms, streamlined operations with suppliers, conducted tender procedures for the procurement of goods and services, and strengthened contracts and their technical specifications to benefit the TPP JSC, which later proved to be advantageous. He achieved cost savings in procurement and carried out extensive work in preparing a document package for the Ministry of Energy of the Republic of Kazakhstan and defending the investment program for the modernization of Ridder TPP JSC with a total amount of 8.8 million tenge in 2019. See Attachment 3 - Letter of recommendation from Olesya Ima.
Законодательные инициативы
В 2021 году the Petitioner будучи директором департамента правового и административного обеспечения Акционерного общества “Телерадиокомпания "Алматы" создал службу антикоррупционного комплаенса, разработал инструкции и антикоррупционную политику. За вклад в развитие телерадиокомпании the Petitioner был награжден благодарственным письмом от генерального директора телерадиокомпании. See Attachment 27 to the original petition – Letter of gratitude.
The Petitioner активно участвовал в совершенствовании Правил размещения государственного заказа по проведению государственной информационной политики на республиканском и региональном уровнях, утвержденных приказом Министра информации и общественного развития Республики Казахстан. В составе рабочей группы the Petitioner вносил предложения по улучшению пунктов Правил, учитывая тонкости законодательства Республики Казахстан о государственных закупках, об авторских правах, а также положения Бюджетного кодекса РК. Вклад the Petitioner способствовал облегчению работы региональных СМИ и государственных органов при размещении государственного заказа и распределении бюджетных средств.
К оригиналу петицию было приложено рекомендательное письмо от Руководителя отдела специальных проектов и правового обеспечения Управления общественного развития города Алматы Bauyrzhan Dar, в котором он утверждает
Thus, in October 2020, amendments were made to the "Anti-Corruption Law," which included the definition of structural units within quasi-governmental sectors tasked with performing functions of anti-corruption compliance services. Their primary objective is to ensure compliance with anti-corruption legislation by the respective organization and its employees.
These changes necessitated a significant volume of legal work. Consequently, all subordinate organizations of the Management were tasked with establishing these services and developing regulatory legal documents, which was a novel initiative not only for the government sector of the city of Almaty but also for all regions of Kazakhstan.
The internal regulatory documents developed by Turar for the TV channel complied with legislative requirements, received approval from the curators of the Anti-Corruption Agency, and were recommended for use as a template for other quasi-governmental organizations.
Another significant contribution by Turar is his involvement in improving the Rules for Government Procurement for the implementation of state information policy at the republican and regional levels, which were approved by the Minister of Information and Social Development of the Republic of Kazakhstan.
He participated in working groups, proposed improvements to the Rules, taking into account the nuances of Kazakhstani legislation on public procurement, copyright, the Budget Code of the Republic of Kazakhstan, and others, which subsequently facilitated the work of all regional media outlets and government agencies in placing government orders and distributing budget funds. See Attachment 4– Letter of recommendation from Bauyrzhan Dar.
Кроме того, Amirzhan Na, head and owner of the design and construction company "Atriks-Stroy" LLP отмечает
So, at the Board of Directors in December 2020, it was decided to reorganize the Society. Thanks to the professionalism of Turar and his efficiency, already in January 2021, changes were registered in the Society's legal documents, including the Charter, have received licenses to conduct activities for the distribution of the TV and radio channel in the authorized body. 
Also, he finalized and brought into compliance with the legislation of the Republic of Kazakhstan all regulatory documents submitted for approval by the Board of Directors of the Society, such as the Regulations on the Board of Directors, on the General Director, on the Corporate Secretary, on the Internal Audit Service and others. Turar introduced the concepts of "corporate conflicts" and "conflicts of interest" in the company and proposed relevant Provisions for approval by the Board of Directors, thereby raising the level of corporate governance in the Society and approaching established international standards. 
When developing the Corporate Code, it was proposed to create committees in the company accountable to the Board of Directors, which in turn enabled the board of Directors to make more balanced, expert decisions. 
It is worth noting his active participation during the tragic events of January 2022. Due to the rallies taking place in the city for several days and the destruction of the offices of the central TV channels of the country, our TV channel remained the only one that could make real video reports from the scene. In a tense situation, risking his life, Turar personally ensured the delivery of video materials to the city headquarters for further transmission to the central authorities of the country and their coverage. 
At the same time, as the director of the legal department, Turar Sy took the initiative and was able to defend material and moral support to colleagues and their relatives who suffered during these "terrible" days for our country. Thus, at the initiative of Turar, the board of directors decided to introduce material payments to employees in the company in the event of death or injury while performing professional activities, rewarding colleagues. See Attachment 30 to the original petition – - Letter of recommendation from Amirzhan Na.
Eldar Tolganbayev, a state inspector in the Administration of the President of the Republic of Kazakhstan также отмечает, что
It is important to emphasize that Turar initially joined the company as the head of the government procurement department. However, his extraordinary skills and knowledge allowed him to be promoted and become the director of the department of legal and administrative support less than a year later.  
Turar made a significant contribution to the work of the TV channel. In addition to resolving daily legal tasks, he has done a lot of work to re-register the company in connection with the change of name, obtaining all the permits and licenses. He brought all the internal regulatory documents into compliance with the law, developed instructions, regulations, and regulated all stages of interaction of structural subdivisions on specific business processes, with a clear distribution of employees' responsibilities. He successfully represented the company's interests in civil law disputes in the courts and government agencies of Kazakhstan, conducted the company's business correspondence with other organizations and institutions, and interacted well with supervising government agencies. He ensured timely implementation of state procurements and utilization of budgetary funds. He also managed to significantly improve and properly organize the work in his department. He established the company's anticorruption compliance service, developed an anticorruption instruction and policy as well as other documents regulating corruption risks. See Attachment 31 to the original petition – Letter of recommendation from Eldar Tolg. 
В 2022 году за вклад в развитие информационной сферы, руководством the Department of Public Development of the city of Almaty объявлена благодарность the Petitioner. See Attachment 27 to the original petition – Letter of gratitude from the Department of Social Development of the city of Almaty.
ПРИМЕР 2.
Оригинальный вклад the Petitioner в качестве Swim Coaching Business Owner and Swimming Instructor for Toddlers, Children and Individuals with Special Needs является значимым в двух областях:
Научно-исследовательская деятельность
Разработка новых подходов к адаптации обучения плаванию для детей с различными формами инвалидности или нарушениями развития.
Изучение потенциала водных занятий как средства реабилитации для детей с физическими или умственными ограничениями.
Проведение исследований о влиянии плавания на различные аспекты здоровья детей, такие как укрепление мышц, улучшение координации движений и общее благополучие.
Спортивная деятельность
Разработка индивидуализированных тренировочных программ для детей с особыми потребностями, учитывающих их физические и психологические особенности.
Участие в специализированных соревнованиях для детей с инвалидностью или особыми потребностями, способствующее повышению их мотивации и самооценки.
Организация спортивных мероприятий, направленных на привлечение внимания общества к важности инклюзивного подхода к спорту и физической активности.
Научно-исследовательская деятельность
В 2015 году the Petitioner с отличием окончила университет и получила квалификацию инженера. See Attachment 26 to the original petition - Professional Diploma with Honors. После окончания университета она приняла решение продолжить карьеру в плавании и поступила в Федеральное государственное бюджетное образовательное учреждение высшего образования "Национальный государственный университет физической культуры, спорта и здоровья имени П.Ф. Лесгафта" в Санкт-Петербурге, который входит в число лучших спортивных вузов страны, на факультет "Физическая культура и спорт". Здесь она прошла профессиональную переподготовку и получила право на ведение профессиональной деятельности в области физической культуры и спорта. See Attachment 27 to the original petition - Diploma on Professional Retraining: Physical Education and Sports.
Во время учебы the Petitioner углубилась в науку плавания, изучая технику, физиологию и психологию спортсменов. В университете она окончательно решила, что хочет стать тренером по плаванию и помогать другим людям достигать их спортивных целей. Получив необходимую квалификацию, она начала работать в детском бассейне "Аквалэнд" под руководством ведущего тренера Людмилы Водой, имеющей 25-летний опыт работы в спорте и образовании. Она научила the Petitioner технике плавания брассом, а также работе с детьми с особыми потребностями. 
Lyudmila Voda в своем рекомендательном письме отмечает
Her work has brought much more than just physical development to children - it has helped little swimmers build their self-esteem, confidence and social skills. Many of her students bесаmе more open and active, began to show more interest in life and participation in various social activities. 
At the same time, Nadezhda took the initiative and independently developed special programs and activities for children with special needs in our swimming pool. For ехаmрlе, the programs "Water Gives Freedom" and "Movement without Borders", adapted for activities with children diagnosed with: "Cerebral Palsy" were highly appreciated and implemented in the compulsory training in the Aqualand pool. Through these programs, the children have improved motility, coordination, strength and flexibility. Competitions "Aquatics for Kids", "Dolphins at the Start", "Junior Swimmers Cup", which are held every season in our pool, were always under the competent and responsive supervision of Nadezhda, for which she regularly received gratitude. See Attachment 28 to the original petition - Recommendation letter from Lyudmila Voda.
С этого момента the Petitioner начала активно изучать особенности работы с детьми с ограниченными возможностями: понимать особенности психофизического развития детей с нарушениями опорно-двигательного аппарата и ДЦП, учитывая их индивидуальные особенности, а также изучать особенности адаптивного плавания, методы и приемы, которые помогают научиться плавать.
The Petitioner разработала собственную методику плавания для детей с особыми потребностями. Ее методика называется "Плавание по-новому и с заботой", которая адаптирована к индивидуальным потребностям каждого ребенка. See Attachment 33 to the original petition - Methodical manual for teaching swimming to children with disabilities "swimming in a new way and with care".
Методика the Petitioner направлена на решение не одной задачи обучения, а комплексного подхода обучения и оздоровления детей, к тому же главное условия это передать любовь в каждом действии.
Особый акцент в программе сделан на использование таких методических подходов, которые позволяют работать с каждым ребенком индивидуально, развивать личностные качества, способствующие формированию у детей культуры отношений к своему здоровью, познавательной и двигательной активности. Детям предоставляется возможность из большого количества упражнений и разных способов выбрать те, которые у них лучше получаются. Это дает возможность каждому относиться к обучению более сознательно и активно. 
В учебный программный материал включены следующие разделы: теоретические сведения; практические навыки по технике плавания (подготовительные упражнения и обучение технике плавания); специальные корригирующие упражнения; упражнения на суше и в воде. See Attachment 33 to the original petition - Methodical manual for teaching swimming to children with disabilities "swimming in a new way and with care".
Постоянно совершенствуясь и изучая новые методики, на основе методики "Осознанное погружение" the Petitioner разработала основные принципы и отобрала 10 наиболее эффективных упражнений, которые позволяют ей с уверенностью утверждать, что она может научить плавать любого ребенка в возрасте от 6 лет всего за 8 занятий. See Attachment 41 to the original petition - Methodical manual on swimming "Effective exercises for successful development of swimming within 8 classes”.
Методическое пособие the Petitioner по плаванию «Эффективные упражнения для успешного освоения плавания за 8 занятий» не только помогает обучающимся приобрести жизненно важные умения и навыки плавания, но и может послужить эффективным способом физического развития и укрепления здоровья. Цель программы: обучение плаванию и физическое самосовершенствование обучающихся посредством занятий в бассейне. 
Задачи программы: 
Образовательные: 
изучение техники плавания и овладение основными навыками плавания; 
знакомство с правилами безопасности на воде; 
формирование общих представлений о плавании, его значении в жизни человека; 
изучение простейших способов контроля за физической нагрузкой. 
Развивающие: 
преодоление водобоязни; 
развитие и совершенствование физических качеств (сила, гибкость, выносливость, быстрота, ловкость); 
развитие интереса к самостоятельным занятиям плаванием; 
укрепление здоровья, закаливание организма обучающихся. 
Воспитательные: 
формирование стойкого положительного отношения к физической культуре в целом и к плаванию в частности. 
воспитание здорового образа жизни и ответственного отношения к своему здоровью.
В 2018 году директор Центра плавания "Малахит" в Екатеринбурге, мастер спорта СССР по плаванию, тренер высшей категории, тренер сборной команды России Pavel Kav обратил внимание на ее знания и опыт в области плавания и тренерской работы. Он воспитал многих многократных чемпионов России и Европы. Среди его учеников - Полина Киселева, Полина Лапшина и Анна Белоусова, все они мастера спорта международного класса. Павел Кав пригласил the Petitioner провести обучающий семинар для своего тренерского состава по ее методике "Плавание по-новому и бережно".
Мы приложили обновленное письмо от Pavel Kav, в котором он отмечает
During these competitions, The Petitioner's coaching prowess was evident as she coached a group of students who achieved remarkable success. In the first competition held on November 11-12, Nadezhda coached 12 students, 9 of whom secured well-deserved podium finishes. Subsequent events held on December 30 and February 10 also witnessed outstanding performances from Nadezhda's students, reflecting her exceptional teaching abilities and dedication to her craft.
The Petitioner's methodology stands out as a remarkable approach that has yielded remarkable outcomes for the coaching team at the “Malachite” Swimming Center, particularly in their work with children facing physical, mental, and communicative challenges. This unique methodology, characterized by its emphasis on individualized instruction and the integration of cutting-edge technologies, has not only elevated the standard of training but also facilitated the swift acclimatization of children to the aquatic setting. By tailoring instruction to the specific needs of each student and leveraging innovative tools, Nadezhda's approach has proven instrumental in empowering children with disabilities to excel in swimming. See Attachment 19 - Letter of interest from Pavel Kav.
Спортивная деятельность
The Petitioner проводила занятия по своей уникальной методике обучения плаванию обычных грудничков, так и детей с ограниченными возможностями. При проведении занятий она применяла дифференцированный подход к каждому ребёнку с учетом его первичных дефектов, вторичных нарушений, сопутствующих заболеваний и медицинских показаний к занятиям, а также учитывала особенности его психических и личностных качеств, а также уровня физического развития и физической подготовленности. Основная цель методики для детей с ДЦП заключалась в том, чтобы ребенок почувствовал себя в воде как можно более самостоятельным.
К оригиналу петиции в приложении 29 было вложено рекомендательное письмо Lyudmila Berva, mother of 6-year-old Oleg, who at the age of 2 was diagnosed with cerebral palsy, spastic diplegia according to GMFCS 1, MASC 1, CFCS2, в котором она говорит
Му son didn't start walking until he was 2 years old and he belongs to Level 1 of the GMFCS Function Classification System. Reimers Index. 
Every six months we go to the N.P. Bekhtereva Human Brain Institute of the Russian Асаdеmу of Sciences for rehabilitation. This is the leading scientific institution in Russia, which has been studying the human brain and its most соmрlex functions for several decades. Specialists at the center develop new methods of treatment at the intersection of medicine, pedagogy, hшnan ecology and high technology. With our attending physician, Elena Suhareva, as well as а neurologist and orthopedist, we test the basic 14 measurements, including Thomas's contra- hip flexion test, Duncan-Eli test, Harmstring test. 
In the rehabilitation of children diagnosed the Cerebral Palsy, there are three main directions that need to bе decided. These are solving рrоblems of motion, communication, and autonomy in maintenance. 
Swimming has а special place in the system of rehabilitation and adaptation of people with cerebral palsy. So when I started looking for а swimming pool, the choice was mаdе in favor of "Aqualand" in Novosibirsk, where the coach 
Nadezhda was highly recommended. After studying reviews of her work and making sure that Nadezhda has all the necessary qualifications, we started working with her. Being а competent specialist in the sphere of working with children with disabilities, Nadezhda helped us to solve mаnу problems. She determined mу child's exact level of functioning and created an individual rehabilitation program based on the International Classification of Functioning Disabilities. 
Health (ICF) code d45000.2, with the emphasis on improving mу child's walking function. Only thanks to Nadezhda we set adequate goals, which we successfully achieved during our training. See Attachment 29 to the original petition - Recommendation letter from Lyudmila Beva.
Мы приложили рекомендательное письмо Алины Н….вой, архитектора программного обеспечения компании IBA Group, которая утверждает
Когда моей дочери в 6 месяцев был поставлен диагноз «Синдром Веста» - тяжелая форма эпилепсии, сопровождающаяся многочисленными инфантильными спазмами (до 50 в день на пике заболевания), для меня и моей семьи настали крайне тяжелые времена. Мы прибегали к различным методам реабилитации, таким как лечебная физкультура, медикаментозная терапия, например препаратом Стимулин, натуропатические средства и результаты были. Постепенно количество спазмов стало снижаться до 30 в день.
Переломным моментом стало знакомство с The Petitioner в ноябре 2023 года. По рекомендации близких друзей, высоко отзывавшихся о ее профессионализме как инструктора по плаванию для детей с особенностями развития, я незамедлительно обратилась к ней за помощью. И это решение оказалось поистине спасительным!
Благодаря ее неиссякаемому терпению, чуткости и высокому профессионализму занятия плаванием стали для Вари не просто реабилитационными процедурами, а настоящим живительным источником душевного спокойствия и радости. За 6 месяцев работы с моей дочерью Надежда сумела создать для нее атмосферу безопасности, доверия и эмоционального комфорта в водной среде. Это позволило значительно снизить уровень стресса - одного из главных триггеров эпилептических приступов. 
Постепенно, из занятия в занятие, я наблюдала, как плавание благотворно влияет на Варю - улучшается ее координация движений, укрепляются мышцы, повышается общий жизненный тонус, это подтверждал и наш лечащий врач. И что особенно ценно – количество приступов эпилепсии начало неуклонно снижаться. Если изначально их было до 50 в день, затем до 30, то сейчас их стабильно около 10 - это поистине колоссальный прогресс!
Я осознаю, что эта общая победа стала возможной благодаря Надежде и ее самоотверженному профессионализму, чуткости и умению найти индивидуальный подход к каждому ребенку. Огромное ей спасибо за неоценимый вклад в реабилитацию моей дочери! Мы продолжаем заниматься и уверены на еще больший успех! See Attachment 20 – Letter of Recommendation from Алина Н….ва.
Khariton K…kiy житель Miami, Florida делится своим мнением:
I am writing to offer my highest recommendation for The Petitioner as an outstanding swimming coach. In my capacity as a civil engineer at Hollub Homes and a resident of Miami, Florida for over a decade, I have had the privilege of witnessing The Petitioner's remarkable impact on the life of my son, Matvey.
Matvey, now 7 years old, has faced significant challenges since birth, including cerebral palsy, impaired vision, and hearing loss. His journey has been marked by resilience and determination, and Nadezhda has played a pivotal role in his development. 
The Petitioner possesses an exceptional understanding of the unique needs of children with special needs and tailors her coaching methods accordingly. Her patience, empathy, and unwavering commitment have been instrumental in Matvey's progress. 
Under The Petitioner's guidance, Matvey has achieved remarkable milestones in his overall development. He has not only learned to swim but has also gained strength, coordination, and confidence in the water. One of the most remarkable achievements has been Matvey's ability to communicate through touch, a skill he developed under The Petitioner's tutelage. 
Beyond her role as a coach, Nadezhda has demonstrated a deep commitment to ongoing education and professional development. She continuously seeks to expand her knowledge and stay updated with the latest studies and treatment approaches related to Matvey's condition. 
The Petitioner's dedication and expertise have had a profound impact on our family. She has transformed Matvey's life, enabling him to overcome challenges and achieve milestones that once seemed unattainable. Her impact is immeasurable, and I am confident that she will continue to inspire and empower others with her exceptional skills and dedication. See Attachment 21 – Letter of Recommendation from Khariton Kay.
Мы также представляем рекомендательное письмо от Evgenia S….ova, фотографа, которая утверждает
My acquaintance with The Petitioner began 6 months ago when she presented at the "Children and Water" event. Nadezhda delivered an incredible lecture titled "Conscious Immersion: A New Approach to Swimming with Newborns." It was a remarkable presentation, rich with scientific insights into infant development during the first year of life. Nadezhda shared secrets of gentle water support and how to swim without causing harm. Her approach to infant water development was truly unique, and it was a revelation for me. Since then, we've become close friends, and The Petitioner has started coaching my son, Maxim.
Therefore, it is a great honor for me to write this recommendation letter for The Petitioner, an outstanding swimming coach with whom I have been training for only 4 months, but I can already say that she is one of the most sensitive and wonderful educators in Miami.
My son Maxim has just turned one, but thanks to The Petitioner, he is already making progress in adapting to the aquatic environment. Her swimming teaching methodology for the little ones is simply incredible. From the very first lessons, Nadezhda was able to create an atmosphere of trust, calmness, and joy in the water for Maxim.
Amazingly, she is so attuned to the baby that it seems like she can read his thoughts. Nadezhda skillfully adjusts the pace, games, and exercises, adapting to Maxim's mood and abilities. Moreover, each session is filled with fun and positive energy.
But what impressed me the most is her boundless patience and care. Nadezhda treats each child as the most precious being on earth. She possesses truly maternal tenderness and affection, which are essential for the harmonious development of our little ones. See Attachment 22 – Letter of Recommendation from Evgenia S….ova.
Еще один житель Miami, Florida Elena D….va, которая занималась с the Petitioner, в своем рекомендательном письме отмечает
Living in Miami, Florida, and working in the IT industry, I have had the unique opportunity to appreciate the contribution and professionalism of The Petitioner in my life and health.
With her experience and expertise, The Petitioner has made a wonderful contribution to my life by providing swimming and aqua aerobics training. Given my sedentary lifestyle and being at 16 weeks of pregnancy, I realized the importance of maintaining an active lifestyle. Thanks to The Petitioner and her training program, my pregnancy went smoothly and without any problems, which was crucial for my physical and emotional well-being. She helped me strengthen my back muscles, improve circulation, and control weight gain, which contributed to delivering oxygen and nutrients to my baby.
I want to emphasize The Petitioner's professionalism and effectiveness in working with pregnant women. Thanks to her individual approach and expert knowledge in the field of swimming and aqua aerobics, I can confidently say that her assistance played a key role in maintaining my health and well-being.
I believe that The Petitioner possesses unique qualities and skills that make her an essential specialist for the health of pregnant women in America and their future children, the future generation of Americans. Her professional contribution to health and physical activity is significant for many people, and I am confident that her talent and efforts will continue to attract attention and respect. See Attachment 23 – Letter of Recommendation from Elena D…..eva.
Мы также приложили рекомендательное письмо от Александры Л…ус из компании Публичное акционерное общество «ОМСКНЕФТЕХИМПРОЕКТ», в котором она говорит:
Когда мы с семьей приехали в Майами на двухмесячный отпуск, я решила воспользоваться этой возможностью и найти для сына квалифицированного инструктора по плаванию. В Инстаграме я наткнулась на профиль Надежды и сразу же была впечатлена ее подходом к занятиям с младенцами.
Для меня было крайне важно, чтобы методики, которые используются при обучении были максимально мягкими и безопасными для столь юного возраста. И Надежда полностью оправдала мои ожидания! Надежда в своей методике не применяет резких движений с большой амплитудой, не использует те упражнения, где происходит сильное статичное напряжение мышц во всем теле, не одобряет те упражнения, которые вмешиваются или вредят естественному физиологическому развитию ребенка.
Под ее чутким руководством мы начали заниматься по методике "осознанного погружения". 
Эта уникальная программа позволила моему сыну Тимофею, буквально за два месяца достичь потрясающих результатов. Он научился самостоятельно контролировать свое дыхание и погружаться в воду с головой, без слез, без стресса, без команд. Потому что обычно специалисты по грудничковому плаванию работают совсем не по гуманным протоколам. Тимофей благодаря занятиям с Надеждой избавился от напряжения, ушла асимметрия в грудном отделе, он обрел гармонию и чувство уверенности в водной среде.
Наблюдая, как мой ребенок с радостью и интересом осваивает навыки плавания, я была поражена ее чуткостью, мягкостью и профессионализмом. 
Результаты занятий превзошли все мои ожидания! Теперь мой сын не только научился контролировать свое тело в воде, но и улучшил координацию движений. Я уверена, что эти навыки станут бесценным подарком для его дальнейшего гармоничного развития. See Attachment 24 – Letter of Recommendation from Александра Л….ус.
Работая в премиальных отелях Турции, the Petitioner в 2021 году снова решила принять участие в Международном конкурсе Oceanman Open Water, в котором участвовало более 1100 человек из 30 стран, но в качестве тренера. В этот раз она подготовила свою ученицу Ирину С….ву к дистанции 2 км, которая преодолела свой страх перед водой и проплыла с очень хорошим результатом, заработав медаль. 
Ирину С….у в своем рекомендательном письме отмечает 
The Petitioner является квалифицированным и дипломированным тренером по плаванию, которая несет огромную пользу в Мир, обучая детей и взрослых жизненно важному навыку – умение плавать. Благодаря Надежде, я сама научилась очень хорошо плавать и даже участвовала в международных соревнованиях Oceanman в Турции в октябре 2019 года, преодолев дистанцию 2 км на открытой воде, что казалось мне невозможным ранее. 
Я всегда боялась воды и не могла представить себя в водной среде без паники и страха. Но благодаря терпению, профессионализму и поддержке Надежды, я научилась не только плавать, но и наслаждаться этим процессом. Она всегда находила правильные слова, чтобы поддержать меня. Ее вера в меня была неоценимой и благодаря ей, я не просто плаваю, а участвую в соревнованиях. See Attachment 39 to the original petition - Recommendation letter from Ирина С…ова.
Кроме того, the Petitioner неоднократно участвовала в организации различных соревнований по плаванию, вела протоколы соревнований и получала высокие оценки от организаторов. В сентябре 2021 года она также участвовала во Всероссийской научно-практической конференции, где обсуждались "Актуальные вопросы подготовки пловцов дальнего и ближнего резерва и спортсменов высокого уровня", а также были отмечены её замечания по соревновательному плаванию.
В качестве доказательства мы приложили Pavel Ka….ov, который утверждает 
Over the past few months, I have had the privilege of witnessing firsthand the exceptional dedication and commitment that The Petitioner has demonstrated in nurturing young swimmers. From November 2023 to February 2024, Nadezhda played a pivotal role in the success of three swimming competitions organized by our institution. Her involvement was instrumental in ensuring the smooth execution of these events, which saw the participation of numerous children across different age groups.
During these competitions, The Petitioner's coaching prowess was evident as she coached a group of students who achieved remarkable success. In the first competition held on November 11-12, Nadezhda coached 12 students, 9 of whom secured well-deserved podium finishes. Subsequent events held on December 30 and February 10 also witnessed outstanding performances from Nadezhda's students, reflecting her exceptional teaching abilities and dedication to her craft. See Attachment 19 - Letter of interest from Pavel K….ov.
Мы также представляем рекомендательное письмо от Alexander Po….ov, a licensed psychologist, который отмечает 
Before entrusting my son to her for training, I observed with admiration how she patiently and skillfully taught other children, who often had varying abilities and fears of the water. Her calm demeanor, clear communication style, and creative teaching methods left the children with joyful smiles on their faces by the end of each lesson. I immediately realized that Nadezhda is an exceptionally talented coach.
When my son Saveliy expressed a desire to pursue swimming professionally, I turned to Nadezhda without hesitation. Her ability to combine discipline with genuine enthusiasm for the sport turned grueling workouts into playtime for Mikhail. She celebrated his small successes along the way, which significantly boosted his self-confidence over time.
After six months of working with Nadezhda, Mikhail had progressed to the point where he could compete in the novice category at the Malakhit Sprint Series - a four-stage competition organized by Nadezhda herself that year. Nadezhda tirelessly worked to create an amazing experience for children of all ages and skill levels. She inspired several other coaches to organize similar events in Miami, and she was involved in every detail, from event logistics and marketing to writing motivational speeches for participants.
At the final stage of the series, I watched with immense pride and gratitude as Mikhail won medals in the 25-meter butterfly and 50-meter freestyle events. This would not have been possible without Nadezhda's outstanding mentorship and coaching. Her dedication to building foundational skills and supporting the long-term athletic development of each child is unmatched.
After Mikhail's success, Nadezhda advised him to join the city swimming team to further advance his skills. Today, Mikhail thrives at the SwimRight Miami academy, thanks to the solid technical foundation laid by Nadezhda. He has many competitions ahead of him and the opportunity to represent our city's team. See Attachment 25 – Letter of Recommendation from Alexander Po….kov.
Thus, we have demonstrated the Petitioner's contribution not only to the development of his own business but also to other aspiring entrepreneurs, as well as his support for environmental conservation through the use of exclusively natural products.
EVIDENCE OF MY AUTHORSHIP OF SCHOLARLY ARTICLES IN PROFESSIONAL OR MAJOR TRADE PUBLICATIONS OR OTHER MAJOR MEDIA
В первом разделе доказываем, действительно ли является петиционер автором указанных научных статей в данной области. Имеются ли цитирования статьи, рецензии и скачивания.
Во втором разделе доказываем, относится ли издание к категории профессионального издания, крупного отраслевого издания или крупного медийного издания. 
Чаще всего этот пункт подтверждается научными статьями, либо колонкой эксперта в отраслевом СМИ. Данный пункт покрывается у всех кандидатов наук, поскольку все они пишут статьи в профессиональные журналы.
Научная статья сообщает об оригинальных исследованиях и экспериментах или состоит из философских рассуждений и, как правило, имеет сноски, концевые сноски или библиографию; она может включать графики, диаграммы или рисунки в качестве иллюстрации концепции, выраженной в статье; кроме того, научная статья написана для сведущих людей в данной области.
Чтобы соответствовать этому критерию, представьте полный список научных статей, автором которых является бенефициар. Доказательства этого могут включать:
Результаты поиска научной литературы на сайтах (например, SciFinder или Google Scholar), где указан автор, название статьи и журнал, в котором она была опубликована; или
Бумажные копии статей бенефициара. Не обязательно представлять полные тексты статей. Для каждой статьи петиционеру необходимо предоставить только страницы, необходимые для того, чтобы показать:
о бенефициаре как авторе;
о Название статьи; и,
о журнале, в котором она была опубликована.
Документальное подтверждение того, что издания, в которых опубликованы статьи, являются профессиональными изданиями, торговыми изданиями или другими крупными СМИ.
Такие доказательства могут включать информацию о тираже. Если подается информация о тираже, она должна быть конкретной для формата СМИ, в котором она была опубликована. То есть, если статья была опубликована в Интернете, доказательства должны относиться к веб-сайту. Если статья была опубликована в печати, доказательства должны относиться к печатному изданию.
Во-первых, USCIS определяет, писал ли человек научные статьи в этой области.
В академической сфере научная статья сообщает об оригинальных исследованиях, экспериментах или философских рассуждениях. Он написан исследователем или экспертом в этой области, который часто связан с колледжем, университетом или исследовательским институтом. Научные статьи также обычно рецензируются другими экспертами в области специализации. Как правило, он должен иметь сноски, концевые примечания или библиографию и может включать графики, диаграммы, видео или изображения в качестве иллюстраций понятий, изложенных в статье.
Примеры авторства научных статей включают, помимо прочего:
Публикации в профессиональных рецензируемых журналах; и
Публикация презентаций на конференциях, признанных на национальном или международном уровне. [25]
Что касается других областей, научная статья должна быть написана для ученых в этой области. («Обученный» определяется как «обладающий глубокими знаниями, полученными в результате обучения»). [26] К образованным лицам относятся все лица, обладающие глубокими знаниями в определенной области.
Во-вторых, USCIS определяет, квалифицируется ли публикация как профессиональная публикация, крупное отраслевое издание или крупное издание в средствах массовой информации.
При оценке того, является ли представленная публикация профессиональным изданием или крупным СМИ, соответствующие факторы включают в себя целевую аудиторию (для профессиональных журналов) и тираж или читательскую аудиторию по сравнению с другими СМИ в данной области (для крупных СМИ).
ПРИМЕР 1.
В 2012 году будучи аспирантом кафедры мировой экономики и экономической теории Волгоградского государственного технического университета я подготовила научное исследование на тему: “Инновационные товарные стратегии как фактор успеха иностранных производителей на российском рынке”. Это исследование является одним из наиболее значимых по теме моей диссертации. Статья была опубликована в сборнике “Современная экономика”, выпуск №7, 2012 год (Enclosed as Attachment 35 is Статья Инновационные товарные стратегии как фактор успеха иностранных производителей на российском рынке). Информация о работе представлена в Google Scholar, согласно которой статья включена в 16 подборок  (Enclosed as Attachment 36 is Article “Информация Google Scholar” - available at https://scholar.google.com/scholar?hl=btnG= ).
Данный журнал входит в перечень Высшей аттестационной комиссии (ВАК). Высшая аттестационная комиссия (ВАК) – это основной орган государственного значения, отвечающий за присуждение ученых степеней (кандидатов и докторов наук) и званий (доцент и профессор) в России. Также ВАК проводит государственную аттестацию научных работников. ВАК анализирует научные работы, имеет собственный утвержденный список рецензируемых журналов, рекомендуемых для публикаций. 
В 2012 году в научном журнале “Известия” Волгоградского государственного технического университета, выпуск №16 была опубликована моя научная статья, которая имеет наибольшую значимость и связана с темой моей диссертационной работы на соискание степени кандидата экономических наук -  “Факторы и мотивы вывода иностранных брендов на российские рынки”. Данный журнал также входит в перечень ВАК (Enclosed as Attachment 37 is Статья Факторы и мотивы вывода иностранных брендов на российские рынки).
Научный журнал “Известия ВолгГТУ” (Свидетельство “О регистрации СМИ” ПИ №ФС77-61113) создан с целью освещения вклада ученых Волгоградского государственного технического университета (ВолгГТУ) в развитии фундаментальной и прикладной науки, публикации результатов наиболее значимых научных и практических исследований, освещения научно-исследовательской работы аспирантов и студентов, научной жизни университета, публикации материалов о международных конференциях и симпозиумах с участием ученых университета.
Журнал включен в Перечень ведущих рецензируемых научных журналов и изданий Высшей аттестационной комиссии (ВАК), в которых должны быть опубликованы основные научные результаты диссертаций на соискание ученых степеней доктора и кандидата наук.
Я доказала, что все вышеперечисленные научные статьи моего авторства опубликованы в профессиональных и крупных отраслевых изданиях. Таким образом, я соответствую данному критерию.
ПРИМЕР 2
127.	We have evidence that The Petitioner's articles were published in professional fashion and fashion design publications and targeted at fashion designers.
128.	There are a number of scientific articles in the fashion industry that cover various aspects related to design, production, marketing, and the impact of fashion on society.
129.	These topics represent only a small part of the many aspects that can be covered in scientific articles in the fashion industry. It is important to note that the fashion field is constantly evolving, and new scientific research may emerge in response to current trends and challenges.
130.	The Petitioner has deep knowledge of the fashion industry, thanks to her studies at Istituto Marangoni, as well as versatile skills in this field.
131.	On May 14, 2021, The Petitioner wrote an article about fashion and style called “Your Own Fashion is Possible,” which was published on a website called Estelle Moda. 
132.	The article combines aspects of sociology, psychology, ergonomics and aesthetics to explore the formation of style in individual and social contexts.
133.	The author analyzes trends in the world of fashion, considering their impact on individual psychology and social perception. The article explores aspects such as the influence of individualization in fashion on self-expression, psychological aspects of style formation, and socio-cultural factors influencing clothing choices and perception. See Attachment 17 to the original petition - "Your own fashion is possible."
134.	The following article, by The Petitioner, published on the Estelle Moda website, is entitled "Green is the new black: how biotechnology is making fashion more sustainable." 
135.	The scientific field of this article pertains to biotechnology and sustainability in the fashion industry. The article covers the use of biotechnology in creating sustainable materials in the fashion industry, highlighting a specific case of developing the material Circulose. The text explores processes and technologies related to transforming worn-out clothing into biodegradable textile fibers, encompassing the scientific and engineering aspects of creating sustainable materials for fashion products. Attachment 18 to the original petition is "Green is the new black: how biotechnology is making fashion more sustainable."
a.	Estellemoda.ru - a website about women's fashion and style: fashion trends 2022-2023, stylist tips on what to wear and how to wear it, street fashion, and celebrity fashion. New clothing collections.
b.	Total Global Visits: 10,138. This metric reflects the overall number of visits to the website from around the world over a specific period. In this case, it is 10,138 visits.
c.	Global Ranking: #6,488,710. The global ranking indicates the overall popularity of the website compared to other web resources on a global scale. In this case, the website is ranked 6,488,710th overall.
d.	Country Ranking (Russia): #344,311. This metric indicates the website's position in the ranking within a specific country, in this case, Russia. The website is ranked 344,311th among web resources in Russia.
e.	Geography of visits: Russia is the main source of traffic, with a share of 91.56%. This indicates a significant interest of the Russian audience in the resource or content.
Poland and Greece also contribute to the traffic, with 5.54% and 2.90%, respectively. This may indicate the international popularity of the resource, attracting visitors from various countries.
f.	User structure: It can be seen that most of the users, 76.91%, return to the site. This may indicate a good retention strategy exciting and valuable content that meets visitors' expectations.
New users account for 23.09%, which may indicate a constant inflow of new visitors. It is important to pay attention to attracting new users to ensure the growth and sustainability of traffic. 
g.	Industry Ranking (Fashion and Apparel): #78,436. The industry ranking reflects the website's position within a specific industry, in this case, Fashion and Apparel. The website is ranked 78,436th in this industry ranking, indicating its popularity and influence in this field.  See Attachment 12 - Website Performance Estellemoda.ru.
EVIDENCE THAT MY WORK HAS BEEN DISPLAYED AT ARTISTIC EXHIBITIONS OR SHOWCASES
В первом разделе доказываем, является ли представленная работа результатом труда данного лица.
Во втором разделе доказываем, были ли места (виртуальные или иные), где демонстрировалась работа человека, художественными выставками или витринами. Онлайн-словарь Merriam-Webster определяет «выставку» как публичный показ (произведений искусства, промышленных объектов или спортивных навыков).
Данный критерий чаще всего используется в искусстве, но бывают и бизнес-выставки, которые можно показать.
Чтобы помочь определить, что выставленная работа была создана бенефициаром, заявитель может представить:
Доказательства того, что произведение в первую очередь было создано бенефициаром.
Материалы, созданные с целью рекламы художественных произведений бенефициара.
Отчеты о продажах, в которых бенефициар указан как автор проданных произведений.
Чтобы помочь определить, что места, где демонстрировались работы бенефициара, являются художественными выставками или витринами, заявитель может представить:
Доказательства того, что места (виртуальные или иные), где демонстрировались работы бенефициара, являлись художественными выставками или витринами.
Материалы, созданные для продвижения и рекламы художественных выставок или витрин.
В данный критерий также можно включать доказательства, если клиент принимал участие на научно-технических выставках и представлял собственные разработки (инновационные проекты, стартапы и т.д.), даже если клиент представлял баннеры и флаеры своей компании. Прикладываются фото и документальные доказательства и описание самого мероприятия. 
ПРИМЕР 1.
Работая в English School of Canada, в 2014 году году я приезжала в Москву на профессиональную образовательную выставку ICEF event - это ведущие в мире сетевые конференции B2B для международных специалистов в области образования, стремящихся расширить свою сеть. 
Я представляла English School of Canada и руководила набором студентов на выставке ICEF, желающих изучать английский язык в Канаде (Enclosed as Attachment 46 is Фото ICEF).
Работая в Assiniboine Community College я неоднократно принимала участие в профессиональных выставках. Одна из них - EduCanada - это ежегодная крупная учебная ярмарка, официальное образовательное мероприятие, организованное правительством Канады. На ярмарке EduCanada можно напрямую общаться с представителями учебных заведений и получить ответы на свои вопросы по поводу обучения в Канаде.
EduCanada проводится с целью увеличения количества иностранных студентов в колледжах и университетах Канады. Я представляла Assiniboine Community College на выставке EduCanada во Вьетнаме (Enclosed as Attachment 47 is Фото EduCanada Вьетнам).
Также я представляла Assiniboine Community College  на выставке Imagine Education au/in Canada в Португалии. Imagine Education au/in Canada - это не только выставка образовательных учреждений, но и бренд, созданный в результате совместных усилий Министерства иностранных дел, торговли и развития Канады (DFATD) и Совета министров образования по продвижению непревзойденно высокой ценности канадского образовательного опыта с целью убедить иностранных студентов в том, что Канадское образование предоставит им инструменты, необходимые для полного раскрытия своего потенциала (Enclosed as Attachment 48 is Фото Imagine Education au/in Canada).
В качестве представителя Assiniboine Community College я принимала участие в International Recruitment Event in India (Enclosed as Attachment 49 is Фото International Recruitment Event in India).
ПРИМЕР 2.
Монопородные выставки проходят по общим правилам Российской Кинологической Федерации, с обязательным выбором лучшей собаки монопородной выставки среди 3 разновидностей. Аналогично для юниоров, беби, щенков и ветеранов.
Монопородные выставки — когда участвуют только представители одной породы. Обычно такие выставки организовывают клубы, которые занимаются разведением конкретной породы. Скажем, это может быть выставка только для бедлингтон-терьеров, а не для всех собак из группы терьеров.
Очень часто монопородные выставки проходят на одной площадке параллельно со всепородной выставкой. В отличие от всепородной выставки, на монопородной собак оценивает судья, который разбирается в конкретной породе.
В России проводятся монопородные выставки разного ранга:
Чемпион Национального Клуба Породы: Это самая престижная и главная выставка, проводимая ежегодно. Лучший кобель и Лучшая сука становятся Чемпионами Клуба.
Победитель Клуба: На таких выставках назначают Победителей Национального Клуба.
Кандидат в Чемпионы Клуба: Выставки этого ранга позволяют Лучшему кобелю и Лучшей суке получить титул Кандидата в Чемпионы Национального Клуба Породы.
Хиллари Руссиш Гайст на Мнонопородной выставке собак породы Брюссельский гриффон «Весенний фестиваль-2013», получив оценку «отлично» получила титул Кандидат в Чемпионы Клуба (Enclosed as Attachment 17 is Диплом Хиллари Руссиш Гайст Монопордной выставки собак Весенний Фестиваль-2013).
Мы с Хиллари Руссиш Гайст 19 апреля 2013 года также принимали участие на Монопородной выставке собак ранга Победитель Клуба, организованной Кубанской Кинологической Федерацией. Хиллари Руссиш Гайст прошла класс Чемпионов на оценку «отлично» и завоевала титулы «Лучшая сука», Победитель Клуба, «Лучший представитель породы» (Enclosed as Attachment 18 is Диплом Хиллари Руссиш Гайст Монопордной выставки собак Весенний Фестиваль-2013).
Выставки собак Национального Клуба Породы проводятся в соответствии с настоящим Правилами проведения и присвоение титулов на выставках ранга: Чемпион Клуба, Победитель клуба и Кандидат в чемпионы национального клуба породы. 
К участию на монопородных выставках ранга Чемпион Клуба, Победитель клуба и Кандидат в чемпионы национального клуба породы допускаются породы собак, признанные FCI и РКФ. Организаторы выставки должны быть уверены, что собаки, заявленные в каталоге, зарегистрированы в Родословной книге страны – члена FCI или American Kennel Club (далее - АКС), The Kennel Club of the UK (далее – KC), The Canadian Kennel Club (далее - CKC). 
На всех сертификатных выставках может быть организован ринг для собак, которым необходимо описание судьи Российской Кинологической Федерации (без присвоения титулов и сертификатов).
Выставки любого ранга могут проводиться только общественными кинологическими организациями, обладающими правом юридического лица. Выставка ранга Чемпиона Клуба может проводиться только 1 раз в год (Enclosed as Attachment 19 is - Положение о проведении выставок Национального Клуба Породы Бельгийские и Брюссельские гриффоны и малые брабансоны).
Кроме того, 25 апреля 2013 года Хиллари Руссиш Гайст выставлялась на Интернациональной выставке собак всех пород (CAC - FCI) «Kuban Spring 2013».
Выставки собак РКФ проводятся в соответствии с требованиями FCI и Положения Российской Кинологической Федерации (РКФ) О выставках ранга CACIB, САС. Сертификатные выставки Ранг САС проводятся Всероссийские и региональные всех пород, в соответствии с календарным планом РКФ.
К участию в Интернациональных выставках ранга CAC допускаются только породы собак, признанные FCI (в рамках Интернациональной выставки могут участвовать породы непризнанные FCI и признанные РКФ без права получения сертификата CAC и участия в главном ринге, которые внесены в отдельный каталог) (Enclosed as Attachment 20 is Положение РКФ о выставках ранга CACIB и CAC).
Хиллари Руссиш Гайст на выставке «Kuban Spring 2013», получив оценку «отлично» завоевала титулы Class winner (далее - CW), CAC (Candidate to National Champion), Чемпион Федерации, RCACIB (Reserve Candidate to International Champion) (Enclosed as Attachment 21 is Диплом Хиллари Руссиш Гайст International DOG-SHOW Kuban Spring 2013).
Приняв участие в двух Монопородных выставках гриффонов и Интернациональной выставке собак всех пород (Candidate to International Champion - Federation Cynologique Internationale) и завоевав соответствующие титулы в феврале 2014 года Хиллари Руссиш Гайст получила титул «Чемпиона России» (Enclosed as Attachment 22 is Сертификат Чемпион России Хиллари Руссиш Гайст февраль 2014).
15 декабря 2013 года Aikemuno Orlando Rotterr Griff на Интернациональной выставке собак всех пород ранга CACIB «NORTH CAUCASUS», проходившем в городе Ставрополь в классе Чемпионы выиграл титулы Победитель класса (присваивается первой собаке в классе, получившей высшую оценку), CAC, CACIB, чемпион РКФ, лучший представитель породы (Enclosed as Attachment 33 and 34 are Диплом Aikemuno Orlando Rotterr Griff Северный Кавказ and Certificate CACIB Aikemuno Orlando Rotterr Griff).
Выставка «NORTH CAUCASUS» была организована Общественной организацией Региональное кинологическое общество Ставропольского края Альянс в соответствии со стандартами FCI.
To be eligible for a FCI award, a dog must meet the following requirements: belong to a breed recognised on a definitive basis by the FCI according to the FCI Breeds nomenclature; be registered with an FCI recognised studbook (the registrations in the appendix to the studbooks are not valid); have a complete pedigree i.e. a pedigree with three (3) generations fully identified and registered with FCI-recognised studbooks and/or Appendices.
Only the dogs correctly entered in open, intermediate, working or champion class are eligible for the CACIB. Number of dogs entered in the catalogue: 501
Затем при общении с другими заводчиками узнала, что можно в Новосибирске выкупить взрослую суку Dayana Black Star (Enclosed as Attachment 35 is Родословная Dayana Black Star). Я ее уже видела к тому времени на выставках, и она мне очень нравилась, владелица продавала Dayana Black Star по личным обстоятельствам, и через пару дней я уже привезла эту собаку домой.
Dayana Black Star имела титулы Юный Чемпион России и Чемпион России и согласно положению о титулах РКФ, она 9 июля 2010 года получила титул Юный Чемпион России (Enclosed as Attachment 36 is Диплом Dayana Black Star Юный Чемпион России) и титул Чемпион России (Enclosed as Attachment 37 is Диплом Dayana Black Star Чемпион России).
24 сентября 2011 года Dayana Black Star на Интернациональной выставке собак всех пород ранга CACIB «Velvet Season-2011», проходившем в городе Сочи в классе Чемпионы выиграла титулы CAC, CACIB, чемпион РКФ, лучший представитель породы, получив оценку «отлично» (Enclosed as Attachment 38-41 are Диплом Dayana Black Star Интернациональной выставки собак Velvet Season-2011, Results of FCI CACIB Shows Velvet Season-2011, Certificate CACIB).
EVIDENCE OF MY PERFORMANCE OF A LEADING OR CRITICAL ROLE IN DISTINGUISHED ORGANIZATIONS
В первом разделе доказываем, занимало ли лицо руководящую или лидирующую должность в организации, учреждении, подразделении или отделе организации или учреждения. Поручались ли клиенту задания, которые мог выполнить только он.
Во втором разделе доказываем, имеет ли организация или учреждение, либо департамент или подразделение, в котором лицо занимает или занимало руководящую или решающую должность, выдающуюся репутацию.
Топ менеджеры, руководители топовых местных организация, международных организаций, благодаря которым были достигнуты высокие результаты. 
Чаще всего этот критерий доказывается рекомендательным письмом от работодателя, в котором описываются достижения работника как экстраординарной личности.
Для определения того, что бенефициарий выполнял ведущую или критическую роль, могут быть представлены следующие документы:
Письма от нынешних или бывших сотрудников) или тренера(ов), которые лично знают о значимости ведущей или критической роли бенефициара.
Письма должны содержать подробную и доказательную информацию, в которой конкретно говорится о том, что роль бенефициара в организации или учреждении является или являлась ведущей или критической. 
Подробные сведения должны включать конкретные задачи или достижения бенефициара по сравнению с другими людьми, занятыми в аналогичной сфере деятельности.
Если письма от нынешнего или бывшего работодателя (работодателей) или тренера (тренеров), лично знакомого со значением 
Документальные свидетельства, подтверждающие, что роль получателя была/является ведущей или критически важной для организаций или учреждений.
Если речь идет о ведущей роли, то доказательства должны подтверждать, что бенефициант является (или являлся) лидером. Название должности с соответствующими обязанностями может помочь установить, является ли роль (или была ли она) на самом деле ведущей.
Если речь идет о критически важной роли, доказательства должны свидетельствовать о том, что бенефициар внес вклад, имеющий существенное значение для результатов деятельности организации или учреждения. Вспомогательная роль может считаться "критической", если деятельность бенефициара в этой роли является (или была) важной. Не название роли бенефициара, а исполнение бенефициаром этой роли определяет, является ли эта роль (или была ли она) критической.
Чтобы помочь определить, что эти организации имеют выдающуюся репутацию, можно представить следующее:
Независимые объективные доказательства, подтверждающие выдающуюся репутацию организаций или учреждений, либо подразделения или отдела организации или учреждения, в которых бенефициар выполнял ведущие или критические роли. Доказательства должны подтверждать выдающиеся достижения, выдающиеся качества или превосходство организации или учреждения.
Доказательства, подтверждающие выдающуюся репутацию организации или учреждения с учетом ее относительного размера и продолжительности существования.
Во-первых, USCIS определяет, выполнял ли человек ведущую или решающую роль в организации, учреждении или подразделении или отделе организации или учреждения.
Примеры ведущих или критических ролей могут включать, помимо прочего:
Старший преподаватель или старшая исследовательская должность на выдающемся академическом факультете или программе;
Старшая исследовательская должность в выдающемся неакадемическом учреждении или компании;
Главный или назначенный исследователь департамента, учреждения или предприятия, получившего государственную награду за заслуги, например, академическое исследование или грант на исследования инноваций в малом бизнесе (SBIR); [30]
Член ключевого комитета известной организации;
Основатель или сооснователь стартапа, имеющего выдающуюся репутацию, или вкладчик интеллектуальной собственности в него; и
Ведущая или решающая роль выдающейся организации или выдающегося подразделения учреждения или компании, подробно объясненная директором или главным исследователем соответствующей организации или подразделения.
Пояснения:
Оценивая такие доказательства, офицеры проверяют, является ли эта роль (или была) ведущей или решающей.
Что касается ведущей роли, офицеры смотрят на то, подтверждают ли доказательства, что данное лицо является (или было) лидером внутри организации или учреждения, или ее подразделения или отдела. Должность с соответствующими обязанностями может помочь установить, что роль действительно является (или была) ведущей.
Важную роль в этом играют офицеры, проверяющие, подтверждают ли доказательства, что данное лицо внесло существенный вклад в результаты деятельности организации или учреждения или подразделения или отдела организации или учреждения.
Второстепенная роль может считаться решающей, если исполнение человеком этой роли важно (или было). Не название роли человека, а скорее его исполнение этой роли определяет, является ли эта роль (или была) решающей.
Это один из критериев, когда письма от лиц, лично знающих о значении ведущей или решающей роли человека, могут быть особенно полезны офицерам при принятии такого решения, при условии, что письма содержат подробную и доказательную информацию, которая конкретно касается того, как роль человека в организация, учреждение, подразделение или отдел были ведущими или критически важными. Подтверждением опыта должны быть письма от работодателей. [31]
Во-вторых, USCIS определяет, имеет ли организация или учреждение, или отдел или подразделение, в котором данное лицо занимает ведущую или решающую роль, выдающуюся репутацию.
Относительный размер или долговечность организации или учреждения сами по себе не являются определяющим фактором, но рассматриваются вместе с другой информацией для определения наличия выдающейся репутации. Другие важные факторы для оценки репутации организации или учреждения могут включать масштаб ее клиентской базы или соответствующее освещение в СМИ.
Для академических факультетов, программ и учреждений сотрудники также могут рассматривать соответствующие и заслуживающие доверия национальные рейтинги и получение государственных исследовательских грантов как положительные факторы.
В отношении начинающего бизнеса должностные лица могут рассматривать доказательства того, что бизнес получил значительное финансирование от государственных органов, фондов венчурного капитала, инвесторов-ангелов или других подобных спонсоров, соизмеримых с раундами финансирования, обычно проводимыми для стадии и отрасли этого стартапа, как положительный фактор в отношении его стартапа. выдающаяся репутация.
Онлайн-словарь Мерриам-Вебстер определяет слово «выдающийся» как «отмеченный выдающимся величием, отличием или превосходством» или «достойное выдающегося человека». 
ПРИМЕР 1.
English School of Canada - февраль 2011 – декабрь 2014 - Manager, International Recruitment
В феврале 2011 года я нашла работу в English School of Canada в Торонто, провинция Онтарио, Канада, благодаря рекомендации моих преподавателей из Centennial College и тому, что я во время первой встречи предложила директору школы развивать новое направление и привлекать студентов из русскоговорящих стран. Я заняла должность Manager, International Recruitment и руководила операциями по набору студентов, привлекая их более чем из 10 стран мира. Для English School of Canada это было абсолютно новое направление, так как ни одного студента из России, Украины и Белоруссии до этого в школе не обучалось. С нуля я организовала работу по привлечению студентов из стран СНГ и значительно расширила рынок, на котором предоставлялись услуги школы. Я часто ездила в рабочие поездки в Украину, Казахстан, Россию и Белоруссию. 
English School of Canada (ESC) – это частная школа английского языка, предлагающая широкий выбор языковых образовательных программ с разными уровнями и направленностью. Ежегодно здесь проходят качественное языковое обучение около 30 тысяч школьников, подростков и студентов более чем из 50 стран мира.
Учебное заведение было основано в Торонто в 1999 году. Сегодня ESC входит в состав образовательной ассоциации, которая занимается организацией обучения на национальных языках Канады. За 24 года успешной работы образовательный центр сформировал себе успешную репутацию, что позволило ему заключить несколько десятков партнерских соглашений с ведущими колледжами и вузами на территории Канады.
Я установила позитивные и профессиональные отношения с образовательными агентствами и университетами-партнерами. Для достижения поставленных целей я взаимодействовала с государственными ассоциациями и посольствами Канады. Я создала и внедрила элементы системы управления обслуживания клиентов, логистики и технической поддержки. Во время моей работы и благодаря моим усилиям было обеспечено консультирование студентов по вопросам будущей карьеры и помощи в регистрации для иностранных граждан.
До 2011 года в English School of Canada не было ни одного русскоговорящего студента из стран СНГ, с нуля я развивала совершенно новое направление для школы и достигла больших успехов. Я проводила выставки, ездила в командировки для подписания соглашений о сотрудничестве с образовательными организациями за рубежом. На протяжении 3-х лет своей работы я привлекала в English School of Canada сотни студентов из России, Белоруссии, Украины и других стран.
Так отзывается о нашем сотрудничестве и непосредственно моей работе основатель и директор English School of Canada Anthony Stillе: “Анна занимала критически важную роль в English School of Canada, и ее работа имела решающее значение для привлечения студентов из России, Украины, Беларуси, Турции и повышения узнаваемости бренда. Перед Анной стояли задачи разработки и реализации маркетинговых стратегий для привлечения иностранных студентов с различных целевых рынков по всему миру. Это включало в себя проведение маркетинговых исследований, определение ключевых тенденций и сотрудничество с внутренними командами для создания убедительных кампаний, демонстрирующих уникальные предложения школы. Анна установила партнерские отношения с образовательными агентами, посещала отраслевые мероприятия и координировала рекламные кампании для повышения узнаваемости и охвата. Кроме того, Анна всегда была в курсе международных тенденций и правил в области образования, чтобы иметь возможность обеспечивать соответствие и конкурентное позиционирование на рынке. Анна представляла не только школу, но и Канаду на многих международных образовательных выставках.
В целом, роль Анны имела решающее значение для роста и репутации English School Of Canada в глобальном масштабе” (Enclosed as Attachment 50 is Рекомендательное письмо от Anthony Stillе).
Хочу также привести слова Sooh Park - бывшего Director of Marketing & Recruitment: “Благодаря Анне English School Of Canada начала свою работу на совершенно новом рынке, набор студентов вырос с 0 до сотен человек в год. Именно Анна наладила партнерские отношения и производила набор студентов для программ изучения английского языка, подготовки к поступлению в университет и летнего лагеря для подростков из России, Беларуси, Украины и Турции.
Вклад Анны в работу English School Of Canada положительно повлиял на рейтинг школы и степень ее узнаваемости в мире. Благодаря новаторским предложениям Анны, English School Of Canada значительно выросла и достигла существенных успехов” (Enclosed as Attachment 51 is Рекомендательное письмо от Sooh Park).
В декабре 2014 года я приняла решение уйти из English School of Canada, так как я многого достигла за это время, подробно изучила рынок, с которым работала и хотела развиваться дальше в профессиональном плане. Я начала искать такую вакансию, которая бы охватывала все рынки и дала мне возможность работать с образовательными учреждениями всех стран.
…. Приводим информацию по всем компаниям
Все это подтверждает мой профессионализм и то, что я стала известным и востребованным специалистом в сфере международного образования и глобального партнерства.
ПРИМЕР2 ИЗ ОДОБРЕННОГО КЕЙСА ПОСЛЕ RFE
We believe that The Petitioner meets this criterion, since all evidence of this was presented in the original petition. 
We draw your attention to the letter of recommendation from Stanivslav Lukyanov, Director of Product Management at GridGain Systems, who states that “I can say that Igor’s contributions to GridGain and Apache Ignite products have been outstanding and have been recognized by the community.
I fully expect Igor to continue playing a critical role in these products. By doing so, he will also be able to develop distributed databases field.”.
The contribution of The Petitioner according to Stanivslav Lu…ov is “During his work, Igor made an essential contribution to the Continuous Query feature in the GridGain platform, which is designed to monitor data modifications occurring in the database and trigger actions based on that, this feature is widely used by our customers in mission-critical systems. His optimization related to the buffer clean-up in the Continuous Query mechanism was crucial and significantly reduced memory consumption by the feature, which made it possible to use it in environments with a limited amount of memory. Also, Igor made critical enhancements related to the stability of the feature, which was highly valued by customers. 
Another scope of his important improvements in the GridGain product is related to the integration with Apache Kafka, which is a distributed event streaming platform used by thousands of companies for high-performance data pipelines, streaming analytics, data integration, and mission-critical applications. Igor made valuable improvements to that, which highly increased amount of use cases for the feature.” See Attachment 57 to the original petition.
In addition, Vladimir Pl…in, Head of Customer Solutions at GridGain Systems claims that "It’s also worth mentioning that Igor made a key contribution to the Expert-on-Call service, which offers to users a paid one-hour call session to discuss occasional questions about Apache Ignite, such as concepts and internals, optimization and troubleshooting, and so on. This activity implies ad-hoc investigations and customer facing interaction. His success in this field clearly reveals his outstanding troubleshooting capabilities combined with excellent communication skills.“ See Attachment 58 to the original petition.
In addition, we present a letter of recommendation from Alexander Sh…in, Customer Solutions Team Lead at GridGain, who shared his opinion
“There was an issue with the implementation of the Random Forest machine learning algorithm, resulting in a model accuracy that fell significantly below expectations. The accuracy of the model is crucial for financial organizations as an incorrect value could result in significant financial losses.
The Petitioner, being the sole individual in the company with expertise in Machine Learning, successfully pinpointed the problem in the execution of the Random Forest algorithm and promptly proposed and developed a solution to rectify it.
The Petitioner's fix has been incorporated into the GridGain 8.8.33 product, which was promptly delivered to our valued customer on August 27, 2023. For more detailed information, please refer to issue GG-37079 in the release notes for GridGain 8.8.33, which can be found at https://www.gridgain.com/docs/latest/release-notes/8.8.33/release-notes_8.8.33. You can find the changes made for this task, as well as a detailed technical explanation, in GridGain's GitHub repository via the following link: https://github.com/gridgain/gridgain/pull/2851.
I would like to emphasize that The Petitioner is the only specialist in our company with experience in the machine learning field, which makes his expertise in the company unique.” See Attachment 12.
GridGain, provider of enterprise-grade in-memory computing software for high-performance applications, today shared details about the company’s continuing momentum as it helps companies deliver the data processing speed and scale necessary to gain insights faster from ever-increasing volumes of information.
In 2022, GridGain experienced its 9th consecutive year of strong revenue growth with cash-positive operations. Responding to customer requests, key enhancements were made to the platform in the areas of high availability, replication, hybrid transactional/analytical processing (HTAP), and disaster recovery. Furthermore, the company deepened its integrations with the top three cloud provider vendors.
Adoption of the GridGain platform expanded significantly from its core use cases in financial services to new critical use cases in telecommunications, transportation & logistics, and retail. In support of its growing customer base, the company established GridGain University. And GridGain strengthened its executive team, announcing the appointment of Eoin O’Connor as President and CEO and Katherine Barnhisel Rincon as Chief Marketing Officer.
“Our customers and prospects continue to tell us that the current economic environment has put even greater pressure on them to make smarter and faster data-based business decisions in order to remain competitive,” said GridGain President and CEO, Eoin O’Connor. “I’m extremely proud that, throughout 2022, the GridGain team continued to execute on our mission of providing customers with the technology and understanding to build out their infrastructures with the speed and scale they need to thrive.”
Growth:
GridGain’s core business has averaged 42% annual sales growth since 2017.
Bookings from existing customers increased by 68% in 2022.
Net revenue retention rate was 123% in 2022, reflecting GridGain’s exceptional customer satisfaction.
The number of companies that have purchased over $1 million from GridGain increased by 22% in 2022.
Awards:
Received an American Business Stevie Award for Company of the Year – Computer Software – Medium.
Ranked on the 2022 Silicon Valley Business Journal list of the Top 25 Fastest Growing Private Companies in Silicon Valley.
Ranked on the 2022 San Francisco Business Times list of the Top 100 Fastest Growing Private Companies in the San Francisco Bay Area.
Received Honorable Mention on the insideBIGDATA IMPACT 50 List.
In-Memory Computing Thought Leadership:
GridGain again hosted two free virtual Ignite Summits in 2022 that featured speakers from CERN, Expedia, HPE, IBM, iFood, JP Morgan Chase, Motorola, AWS Aurora, GridGain and more. More than 1,200 attendees from around the world heard talks and participated in discussions on a wide range of topics around modern data architectures and leading industry use cases.
In addition to the Ignite Summits, GridGain continued its in-memory computing thought leadership and education program, delivering valuable resources and hosting and participating in a wide variety of webinars, meetups, training sessions and conferences.
GridGain Systems is revolutionizing real-time data access and processing by offering an enterprise-grade cloud-native in-memory computing platform. Common use cases for the GridGain platform include high-speed operational analytics, application acceleration, AI/ML model training, and digital integration hubs for real-time data access across data sources and applications. GridGain solutions are used by global enterprises in financial services, software, e-commerce, retail, online business services, healthcare, telecom, transportation, logistics, and other major industries, with a client list that includes ING, Citibank, American Express, AutoZone, UPS, 24 Hour Fitness, Microsoft, American Airlines, Agilent and UnitedHealthcare. For more information, visit gridgain.com. See Attachment 49 – Article “GridGain Systems Highlights Strong Growth in 2022” February 2, 2023 - available at https://www.datanami.com/this-just-in/gridgain-systems-highlights-strong-growth-in-2022/
GridGain®, provider of a leading unified real-time data platform, today announced several industry recognition awards and accolades we believe reflect GridGain’s continued success in helping enterprises solve their most complex data speed and scale challenges. Throughout 2023, the company’s unified real-time data platform has garnered industry recognition in various forms, including from industry analysts such as Gartner and Bloor Group, and publications such as Database Trends and Applications and InsideBigData.
“For more than 15 years, GridGain has enabled its enterprise customers to overcome the limitations of their data infrastructures and deliver the high-speed, highly scalable applications they need for true competitive differentiation,” said GridGain Chief Marketing Officer, Katherine Rincon. “Today, our enhanced Unified Real-Time Data Platform is once again enabling more enterprises to handle their most complex and demanding data workloads, such as those supporting AI, fraud detection, smart decisioning, operational analytics, and customer 360°. We are extremely grateful that the industry continues to recognize us.”
Gartner – GridGain was named in the newly introduced “Unified Real-Time Platforms” category in the 2023 Gartner Market Guide for Event Stream Processing1. According to Gartner, “Unified platforms combine many or all of the features of an ESP platform with a DBMS or in-memory data grid and a programmable application engine. Unified platforms are a relatively new kind of infrastructure software that supports operational or analytical business applications that need to process both streaming data in-motion and historical data at-rest. Like ESP platforms, unified platforms can execute custom business logic and analytical functions such as ML inferences and rules. However, they also have capabilities not available from ESP platforms, specifically including support for synchronous, request/reply interactions and the capability to manage long-term reference and state data.”
Bloor InBrief Report – The GridGain Unified Real-Time Data Platform was highlighted in a Bloor InBrief Report. Analyst Daniel Howard described the capabilities of GridGain: “It is capable of handling data at rest and data in motion, transaction and analytical processing, AI and MLOps, and stream processing, all using a unified infrastructure. ‘Collocated’ analytics can be performed wherever the relevant data resides, mitigating the need for data movement. It can also integrate with (multiple) systems of record. In short, it can be used to simplify and optimise your data ecosystem.”
Bloor 2023 Mutable Award – GridGain received a Bloor Mutable Gold Award 2023 for the GridGain Platform. In its “Bottom Line” description, the report said, “The GridGain Unified Real-Time Data Platform is highly performant and can address a variety of data processing use cases. This should make it appealing if your goal is to streamline, accelerate, and/or consolidate your data ecosystem.”
2023 American Business Awards – GridGain received a Gold Stevie Award in the “Company of the Year – Computer Software – Medium” category.
Database Trends and Applications Big Data 75 – GridGain was highlighted as a “Trailblazer” in the Big Data 75: Companies Driving Innovation in 2023 list. A description of GridGain by Lalit Ahuja, GridGain’s Chief Product & Customer Officer, was included in the listing.
InsideBIGDATA – GridGain received an Honorable Mention in the InsideBIGDATA IMPACT 50 List for Q1, Q2, Q3 and Q4 of 2023. According to InsideBIGDATA, the companies included on the list “have proven their relevance by the way they’re impacting the enterprise through leading edge products and services.”. See Attachment 50 – Article “GridGain Garners Broad Industry Recognition in 2023” by Globe Newswire, October 30, 2023 - available at https://ai-techpark.com/gridgain-garners-broad-industry-recognition-in-2023/
EVIDENCE THAT I COMMAND A HIGH SALARY OR OTHER SIGNIFICANTLY HIGH REMUNERATION IN RELATION TO OTHERS IN THE FIELD
В первом разделе доказываем, была ли зарплата или вознаграждение высокой (справка о зарплате, налоговые декларации и т.д.)
Во втором разделе доказываем,  является ли зарплата или вознаграждение человека высокими по сравнению с компенсацией, выплачиваемой другим работающим в этой области
ВЫСОКИЕ ГОНОРАРЫ — Высокая заработная плата или высокое вознаграждение другого рода
Конечно же все, что касается денег познается в сравнении, но в сравнении с местностью где находится объект исследования. Поэтому сравнивать зарплату необходимо с официальной статистикой того региона, где живет наш претендент.
Чтобы помочь определить, что зарплата или вознаграждение бенефициара высоки по сравнению с другими людьми, работающими в данной области, заявитель может представить:
Копии форм W-2 или 1099 бенефициара за годы, в которые бенефициар получал высокую зарплату в данной сфере деятельности. В качестве альтернативы заявитель может предоставить аналогичные иностранные налоговые документы, подтверждающие годовую зарплату, полученную за пределами США.
Сообщения СМИ о заметно высоких зарплатах, получаемых другими людьми в сфере деятельности бенефициара.
Составленный авторитетной профессиональной организацией (организациями) список самых высокооплачиваемых специалистов в данной области.
Географические или соответствующие должности исследования компенсаций;
 Обоснования организации для выплаты зарплаты выше данных о компенсации;
Информация из Министерства труда США или аналогичных источников, показывающая сравнение зарплат внутри штатов, между штатами и т. д. (см. примечание ниже).
Примечание: Информация Министерства труда США о преобладающих ставках заработной платы сама по себе, как правило, не позволяет установить, является ли зарплата или иное вознаграждение "значительно" выше, чем у других сотрудников в данной области. Если информация о преобладающей ставке заработной платы Министерства труда США представлена, она должна сопровождаться другими подтверждающими доказательствами, показывающими, что ставка заработной платы является высокой по сравнению с другими работниками в данной области. (Примеры приведены выше).
USCIS определяет, высока ли зарплата или вознаграждение человека по сравнению с компенсациями, выплачиваемыми другим, работающим в этой области. USCIS не интерпретирует фразу «приказал» как означающую, что человек уже должен был получить такую зарплату или вознаграждение, чтобы соответствовать критерию. Скорее, заслуживающий доверия контракт или предложение о работе, показывающее предполагаемую зарплату или вознаграждение, может доказать, что человек имел возможность претендовать на такую компенсацию.
Доказательства, подтверждающие высокое вознаграждение, могут включать, помимо прочего:
Налоговые декларации, отчеты о заработной плате или другие доказательства прошлой зарплаты или вознаграждения за услуги;
Контракт, письмо с предложением о работе или другие доказательства предполагаемой зарплаты или вознаграждения за услуги; и
Сравнительные данные о заработной плате или вознаграждении для сферы деятельности человека, например, географические исследования или исследования компенсаций, соответствующие должности.
Пояснения:
Доказательства того, является ли вознаграждение этого человека высоким по сравнению с вознаграждением других лиц, работающих в этой области, могут принимать разные формы. Примеры могут включать, помимо прочего, географические исследования или исследования компенсаций, соответствующие должности, а также организационные обоснования выплаты сверх данных о компенсациях. Следующие веб-сайты, среди прочих, могут быть полезны при оценке относительной компенсации в конкретной области:
Веб-страница Бюро статистики труда (BLS) с обзором данных BLS о заработной плате по регионам и профессиям ; и
Веб-сайт Career One Stop Министерства труда .
При оценке того, является ли сравнение документально подтвержденного вознаграждения бенефициара и вознаграждения, указанного в опросе, среди прочего могут иметь значение следующие соображения:
Описание занятия. Широкие описания, включающие несколько профессий или несколько отраслей, могут не обеспечить точного сравнения с другими в этой области. Например, «режиссеры и продюсеры» могут быть указаны как одна категория для всех отраслей, но доказательства того, что кинорежиссер получает высокое вознаграждение, основанные на широком спектре профессиональных данных, которые включают в себя разрозненные профессии, такие как кинорежиссер и продюсер радиошоу, могут не учитываться. быть достаточно доказательными;
Валидность опроса. Некоторые веб-сайты предоставляют данные о заработной плате, сообщаемые пользователями, которые могут быть недопустимыми для сравнения, если, например, слишком мало пользователей сообщили о своей зарплате или данные по другим причинам не заслуживают доверия или ненадежны;
Местоположение и валюта. Офицеры оценивают людей, работающих за пределами Соединенных Штатов, на основе статистики заработной платы или сопоставимых данных, относящихся к соответствующему месту работы, а не просто конвертируя зарплату в доллары США и затем проверяя, будет ли эта зарплата считаться высокой в Соединенных Штатах; и
Размер заработной платы измеряется. Офицеры учитывают, измеряют ли сравнительные данные почасовую ставку или годовую зарплату. Еще одним соображением является то, как эта информация соотносится с заработной платой бенефициара. Многим художникам не платят почасовую ставку, а вместо этого платят дневную ставку (которая может не соответствовать 8 часам) или определенную сумму за проект (включающий неизвестное количество или часы). Однако данные о почасовой заработной плате могут по-прежнему иметь доказательное значение, если заявитель предоставит документацию о количестве отработанных часов. Такая документация может включать, помимо прочего, отчеты о заработной плате, кадровые данные или свидетельские показания соответствующего работодателя.
Что касается предпринимателей или основателей стартапов, офицеры рассматривают доказательства того, что бизнес получил значительное финансирование от государственных органов, фондов венчурного капитала, инвесторов-ангелов или других подобных спонсоров при оценке достоверности представленных контрактов, писем с предложениями о работе или других доказательств предполагаемых заработная плата или вознаграждение за услуги.
Информация о заработной плате, которая дается в виде справки – должность клиента должна указываться как в области его Area of expertise, поскольку Officer USCIS может не принять. Пример Клиента. Она работала в казахстанской компании на позиции Fuel Engineer (в Справке о заработной плате указано Fuel Engineer), Area of expertise клиентки в I-140 Petroleum engineer, статистика о средней зарплате по стране для сравнения бралась по Petroleum Engineer. В RFE Officer указал, что это две разные позиции и НЕ принял доказательства. В таких случаях необходимо в BLS либо DOL найти функциональные обязанности Petroleum Engineer, которые Департамент труда считает, что относится к этой должности и сопоставить функциональные обязанности Fuel Engineer и Petroleum Engineer через сравнение, то есть провести параллели, и расписать детально, что Fuel Engineer по функциональным обязанностям соответствуют Petroleum Engineer. В идеале – в Справке указывается, что должность называется Fuel Engineer, функциональные обязанности относятся к Petroleum Engineer.
Чтобы избежать сравнительный анализ функциональных обязанностей необходимо подготовить письмо от кадровиков письмо, в котором указывается сфера экспертности
.
Периоды, указываемые в справке о заработной плате. Периодичность может быть 1 месяц, 3 месяца, 6 месяцев либо год. Это выбираем мы сами. Если в справке указывается заработная плата за последние три года, то мы не можем брать информацию по заработной плате меньше, чем за год. 
Если клиент предоставил налоговую декларацию, также сравниваем со среднегодовой заработной платой по данным статистики либо из данными о заработной плате. Периоды должны быть идентичными, например, справка или декларация за 2022 год, для сравнения используем статданные за 2022 год.
Конвертация валют обязательна.
Касательно форм W-2 или 1099, как указано в Руководстве USCIS не получится предоставить доказательства поскольку зарплата по ним маленькая. Для сравнения лучше брать заработную плату в своей сфере до заезда в США.
По фрилансерам. По фрилансерам не будет справки о заработной плате, у них услуги оказываются по контрактам, заключенным между фрилансером и работодателем оказания услуги. В случае если контракт заключен на определённую сумму без срока оказания услуг, то клиенту нужно получить письмо от компании, в котором будет указано, что с клиентом был заключен контракт на сумму 10000$, который длился…. (и сократить период выполнения работы). К примеру, по контракту работа выполнялась в течение года в письме необходимо указать 3 месяца или 6 месяцев и делим 10000$ и ищем информацию по заработной плате по данному виду деятельности. Например, видеограф заключил контракт с компанией из NY для съемок рекламной кампании. В контракте не оговорен срок выполнения работы. Но, клиент получает от компании письмо, что между ним и компанией заключен контракт на сумму 15000$, работа выполнена за период с января 2024 по март 2024. Мы делим 15000$ на 3 месяца (январь, февраль, март) = 5000$. Далее ищем информацию о заработной плате видеографов по NY для сравнения.
ПРИМЕР 1
Одна из самых высоких зарплат руководителя по финансовым вопросам в Канаде составляет $136,000.00 в год на декабрь 2023 года (Enclosed as Attachment 79 is Article “Salary”, available at - https://ca.indeed.com/cmp/University-of-Toronto/salaries/Finance-Officer ).
 С 2022 года по настоящее время мой ежегодный доход составляет $180,000.00, что в 1,3 раз выше самых высоких зарплат руководителей по финансовым вопросам (Enclosed as Attachment 80 is Подтверждение доходов).
Таким образом, я соответствую заявленному критерию. 
ПРИМЕР 2. КОГДА СРАВНИВАЕМ ДОХОДЫ КОМПАНИИ КЛИЕНТА С ДОХОДАМИ ДРУГИХ КОМПАНИЙ
In April 2012, The Petitioner founded Drillpoint LLC, a company specializing in supplying drilling rigs and their components in Russia. See Attachment 40 to the original petition - Information about Drillpoint. 
In December 2014, the Petitioner established a second company, Drilling Professionals LLC, specializing in drilling projects. See Attachment 44 to the original petition - Certificate of registration of Bur Drill Prof. 
The turnover of companies led by the Petitioner has reached an impressive $1.5 million USD in recent years. One of the most successful projects was the development and supply of RC drilling equipment for pneumatic lifting ventilation wells in an underground mine. The complete set of equipment, including large-sized drilling heads with diameters of 1700 and 1360 mm, was successfully delivered and is in active operation. This project is valued at over 2 billion rubles, making it a significant contribution to the financial development of the company.
The revenue of Bur Prof LLC, according to the financial statement, amounted to 107.7 million rubles or $1,472,899 USD in 2021. See Attachments 56 and 57 to the original petition - Bur Prof LLC’s balance sheet, 2021 and Information about ruble’s exchange rate.
In comparison, according to the analysis of financial indicators of companies similar in their main activities and region of operation provided on the portal of the All-Russian Business Center, in 2021, the revenue of BRYANSKGAZSTROY LLC amounted to 2.97 million rubles or $31,898 USD. The revenue of Bur Prof LLC was 3,526.3% higher than the revenue of BRYANSKGAZSTROY LLC. See Attachments 10 - Results of operations of BRYANSKGAZSTROY LLC and currency conversions. 
In 2021, the revenue of GEOCENTER B LLC amounted to 8.56 million rubles or $91,934 USD. The revenue of Bur Prof LLC was 1,158.2% higher than the revenue of GEOCENTER B LLC. See Attachments 11 - GEOCENTER B LLC results of operations and currency conversion. 
In 2021, the revenue of GIDBURSERVICE LLC amounted to 4.77 million rubles or $51,205 USD. The revenue of Bur Prof LLC was 2,157.9% higher than the revenue of GIDBURSERVICE LLC. See Attachment 12 - GIDBURSERVICE LLC results of operations and currency conversions.
Furthermore, in Attachment 55 to the original petition, we attached the Bank Statement of the Petitioner, according to which the Petitioner’s income for the period from 01/01/2022 to 12/21/2022 amounted to 7,576,016 rubles or $80,988 USD.  (See Attachment 55 to the original petition - Petitioner’s Bank statement as Individual Entrepreneur, 2022) or $80,988 USD. See Attachment 13 - Exchange Rate Russian Ruble to US Dollar Conversion.
The average monthly salary of the Petitioner for 2022 amounted to 631,335 rubles (7,576,016 / 12 = 631,335) or $6,765 USD, which was 4.7 times higher compared to the salary of the Head of Direction.  
In alignment with this principle of the Matter of Muni v. INS, 891 F. Supp. 440 (N.D. Ill. 1995), we are of the position that we can compare the petitioner’s remuneration with the average salary in this field. 
Moreover, since a few very highly paid players can skew the average salary upward, it is reasonable to assume that a player making even the average salary is making more than most other players.
As we can see, the high remuneration of the Petitioner significantly exceeds the average salary of a Head of Direction in Moscow, which was 134,272 rubles or $1,439 USD in 2022, according to the statistics from GorodRabot.ru. (https://gorodrabot.ru/salary?p=%D1%80%D1%83%D0%BA%D0%BE%D0%B2%D0%BE%D0%B4%D0%B8%D1%82%D0%B5%D0%BB%D1%8C+%D0%BD%D0%B0%D0%BF%D1%80%D0%B0%D0%B2%D0%BB%D0%B5%D0%BD%D0%B8%D1%8F&l=%D0%BC%D0%BE%D1%81%D0%BA%D0%B2%D0%B0&y=2022). See Attachment 14 – Salary of the Head of Direction and currency conversion.
ПРИМЕР 3.
While operating the business, Petitioner achieved significant financial success, as evidenced by the Tax return for the year 2022, indicating earnings of 5,608,679 Rubles for that tax period, equivalent to $58,625.87 U.S. dollars. (See Attachment 19 – Tax return). This substantial income demonstrates the Petitioner's status as a high earner within his native country, particularly in the Republic of Buryatia, where the average monthly in 2021 was 37,337 Rubles, or $390.45 U.S. dollars. (See Attachment 20 - Average monthly wages of employees in organizations, individual entrepreneurs and individuals with Russian ruble conversion)
Additionally, Beeline Business conducted a study among 70,000 entrepreneurs, revealing insightful data on their monthly earnings. The findings indicate that 29.23% of entrepreneurs receive an average income ranging between 75,000 to 100,000 rubles per month. When converting these numbers into the USD, we can set that salary starts from 819$ to 1092$ U.S. dollars. (See Attachment 21 – Currency Conversion).  Petitioner’s earnings are significantly more which equals $58,625.87 U.S. dollars.
Additionally, 23.84% of respondents reported earnings within the bracket of 100,000 to 150,000 rubles, while 22.62% indicated monthly incomes falling between 50,000 to 75,000 rubles. (See Attachment 22 – Article  “ENTREPRENEUR: WHO THEY ARE, HOW MUCH THEY CAN EARN, AND HOW TO BECOME ONE”). The same amount equals 1092$ and 1638 U.S. dollars for 23.84% of respondents, and from 546$ to 817$ U.S. dollars. (See Attachment 23 – Currency Conversion). This again shows that Petitioner’s earnings were higher than the statistics results. 
EVIDENCE OF MY COMMERCIAL SUCCESSES IN THE PERFORMING ARTS
Чтобы помочь определить, что бенефициар добился коммерческого успеха в исполнительском искусстве, заявитель может представить:
Доказательства, такие как:
Кассовые чеки; или,
Квитанции о продаже аудио- или видеозаписей, подтверждающие успех в исполнительском искусстве.
Примечание: В данном критерии основное внимание уделяется объему продаж и кассовым сборам как показателю коммерческого успеха бенефициара в исполнительском искусстве. Одного факта записи и выпуска музыкальных сборников или участия в театральных, кино- или телевизионных постановках будет недостаточно. Доказательства должны свидетельствовать о том, что объем продаж и кассовые сборы отражают коммерческий успех бенефициара по сравнению с другими лицами, занимающимися аналогичной деятельностью в сфере исполнительского искусства.
USCIS определяет, добился ли человек коммерческого успеха в исполнительском искусстве.
Этот критерий ориентирован на объем продаж и кассовые сборы как меру коммерческого успеха человека в исполнительском искусстве. Следовательно, одного лишь факта, что человек записал и выпустил музыкальные сборники или принял участие в театральных, кино- или телевизионных постановках, само по себе недостаточно для соответствия этому критерию. Доказательства должны показывать, что объем продаж и кассовые сборы отражают коммерческий успех данного лица по сравнению с другими лицами, занимающимися аналогичной деятельностью в сфере исполнительских искусств.
COMPARABLE EVIDENCE
Здесь включаем доказательства и достижения клиента, которые не вошли в 10 критериев вплоть до назначения на должность. Все достижения расписываются в деталях.
Например, грант «Болашак», разные гранты, патенты и т.д.
DOCUMENTATION TO ESTABLISH THAT I WILL CONTINUE TO WORK IN THEIR CLAIMED AREA OF EXPERTISE
Необходимо показать, как бенефициар будет продолжать работать в США в заявленной области знаний. В петиции не указано, что у бенефициара есть заранее оговоренные обязательства по работе в данной области. Пожалуйста, предоставьте доказательства того, что бенефициар приезжает в США для продолжения работы в данной области. Работа должна быть в области, в которой бенефициар получил устойчивое национальное или международное признание, и его достижения были признаны, что указывает на то, что он является одним из того небольшого процента, который поднялся на самый верх в этой области.
Доказательства, которые могут быть представлены для выполнения этого требования, включают, но не ограничиваются:
Job Offers если клиент планирует работать по найму 
трудовые договоры; или 
Business Plan, если клиент планирует открывать компанию;
Письма о заинтересованности
Заявление бенефициара с подробным описанием планов по продолжению работы в США.
Важно, если у клиента есть кейс EB2 NIW, то часть Area of expertise в части Business Plan или планов на будущее нужно перенести и сюда. То есть планы на будущее в двух кейсах должны быть идентичными в EB1 и в EB2 NIW
Поскольку практически во всех RFE офицеры запрашивают доказательства того, что клиент продолжить свою деятельность на территории США, в этой части EB1 прикладываем Job Offers либо Business Plan.
ПРИМЕР 1
In March, the Petitioner registered her company NKS LLC in Miami, Florida. The registration document is attached to the original petition. See Attachment 47 to the original petition.
According to the Business Plan attached to the original petition, the Petitioner planned to open a mobile swimming school aimed at providing high-quality swimming instruction to people of all ages and abilities, including a group of individuals with special needs.
The mobile swimming school offered by the Petitioner provides service directions in the form of swimming courses for people of all ages and skill levels, namely:
Swimming lessons for babies aged 6 to 24 months. Swimming has a strengthening effect on babies - the muscles of the back, tummy, neck, arms and legs are strengthened. In addition, early swimming stimulates blood circulation, develops the heart muscle, and also tones the baby’s skin. By swimming, the baby develops all the main systems of the body: cardiovascular, respiratory, muscular, nervous. Swimming strengthens the immune system of the child. In addition, swimming can create a fun and stimulating environment for babies to learn and grow. Children who are accustomed to water from an early age are distinguished by stronger immunity and physical endurance.
The mission of the swimming school is to introduce young children to water safety as early as possible. This can help prevent accidental drowning and lay the foundation for future swimming skills.
Swimming lessons for children. During swimming lessons, children significantly improve the condition of the lungs and heart. Swimming helps in the prevention of all diseases of the respiratory system, because the correct breathing directed by the coach helps to increase the volume of the lungs and has a positive effect on the tone of the respiratory muscles. Oxygen saturation directly affects brain function. Children who regularly go swimming are more self-collected, attentive and quick-witted. Swimming tones up the nervous system, balances the processes of excitation and inhibition, and improves the blood supply to the brain.
Swimming lessons for adults. Swimming harmoniously develops all muscle groups, strengthens the joints and helps keep the body in good shape. The pool is especially recommended for people with sedentary work. In the water, there is a load on the pectoral and dorsal muscles, the shoulder and neck girdle is pumped, posture improves, legs and joints are strengthened. See Attachment 45 to the original petition - the Business plan, page 6.
We have attached the Letter of recommendation from the parent of a child with special needs - cerebral palsy from Miami, with whom the Petitioner worked. In this letter of recommendation, the child's father noted the progress of his child after working with the Petitioner:
Matvey, now 7 years old, has faced significant challenges since birth, including cerebral palsy, impaired vision, and hearing loss. His journey has been marked by resilience and determination, and Nadezhda has played a pivotal role in his development.
the Petitioner possesses an exceptional understanding of the unique needs of children with special needs and tailors her coaching methods accordingly. Her patience, empathy, and unwavering commitment have been instrumental in Matvey’s progress. 
Under the Petitioner’s guidance, Matvey has achieved remarkable milestones in his overall development. He has not only learned to swim but has also gained strength, coordination, and confidence in the water. One of the most remarkable achievements has been Matvey’s ability to communicate through touch, a skill he developed under the Petitioner’s tutelage. See Attachment 21 - the Letter of recommendation from Khariton K….kiy.
Evgenia S…..ova, a photographer writes
My son Maxim has just turned one, but thanks to the Petitioner, he is already making progress in adapting to the aquatic environment. Her swimming teaching methodology for the little ones is simply incredible. From the very first lessons, Nadezhda was able to create an atmosphere of trust, calmness, and joy in the water for Maxim. 
Amazingly, she is so attuned to the baby that it seems like she can read his thoughts. Nadezhda skillfully adjusts the pace, games, and exercises, adapting to Maxim’s mood and abilities. Moreover, each session is filled with fun and positive energy. 
But what impressed me the most is her boundless patience and care. Nadezhda treats each child as the most precious being on earth. She possesses truly maternal tenderness and affection, which are essential for the harmonious development of our little ones. See Attachment 22 - the Letter of recommendation from Evgenia S….ova.
Next, the Petitioner received the Letter of recommendation from Elena D….eva, a resident of Miami, Florida, who shares:
With her experience and expertise, the Petitioner has made a wonderful contribution to my life by providing swimming and aqua aerobics training. Given my sedentary lifestyle and being at 16 weeks of pregnancy, I realized the importance of maintaining an active lifestyle. Thanks to the Petitioner and her training program, my pregnancy went smoothly and without any problems, which was crucial for my physical and emotional well-being. She helped me strengthen my back muscles, improve circulation, and control weight gain, which contributed to delivering oxygen and nutrients to my baby.
I want to emphasize the Petitioner’s professionalism and effectiveness in working with pregnant women. Thanks to her individual approach and expert knowledge in the field of swimming and aqua aerobics, I can confidently say that her assistance played a key role in maintaining my health and well-being. See Attachment 23 - the Letter of recommendation from Elena Do…..eva.
With that said, we present an expansion of the Business Plan, according to which the Petitioner plans to open a franchise of the N….im mobile swimming school.
Having conducted additional market research and considering demographic characteristics, competition, and potential client base, the Petitioner has selected cities where demand for swimming school services is expected to be high. Among the selected cities are: New York (New York), San Diego (California), Los Angeles (California), San Francisco (California), Phoenix (Arizona), Scottsdale (Arizona), Tampa (Florida), Orlando (Florida), Dallas (Texas), Houston (Texas), Austin (Texas), and Chicago (Illinois).
These are major cities with developed infrastructure and a significant number of children who may have special needs that could require specialized services from the NKswim mobile swimming school. All franchise trainers will undergo special training, as children with disabilities require an individualized approach to teaching, which differs from commonly accepted methods. Continuous quality control and feedback from clients will be one of the mandatory conditions.
For efficient business management, including sales monitoring, quality control, and customer account management, we will utilize the cutting-edge Monday.com platform.
Upon franchise opening, we will develop strategic growth and support plans, encompassing training, marketing assistance, legal aid, and operational consultation. See Attachment 27 - the Business Plan Expansion, page 1.
The Petitioner also plans to conduct offline and online swimming coach training in Florida and other states.
The Petitioner’s plans for offline swimming coach training in Florida and other states include the following stages:
Theoretical Information: Developing educational materials that systematize the fundamental principles of the “Swimming in a New Way and with Care” methodology for children with special needs. These materials will include guides on adapting exercises, establishing effective communication with children, and ensuring their safety.
Practical Guidance: Providing detailed instructions and guidance on conducting exercises and swimming techniques for children with different needs. This includes demonstration videos or illustrations to help trainers master the correct technique.
Online training will involve creating an online platform where trainers can access educational materials, video tutorials, and assignments. The platform will be user-friendly and intuitive to use. 
Additionally, there are plans to create a discussion forum where trainers can share experiences, ask questions, and provide quality assistance to each other.
The Petitioner’s plans also include organizing training camps and intensives for trainers, where they can receive in-depth training and practical swimming sessions.
Additionally, The Petitioner plans to establish partnerships with local swimming clubs and organizations, through which they will recruit trainers for training. See Attachment 27 - the Business Plan Expansion.
As evidence of the measures taken to establish partnerships, The Petitioner has attached Letters she wrote to three companies. Florida Gold Coast Swimming, Public Records Custodian Communications, Public Records Custodian Parks, Recreation and Open Spaces.
In particular, in the Letters addressed to these companies, the Petitioner writes:
I am writing to introduce N…IM LLC, a private swimming school located in Miami, Florida. For the past 1 year, we have been dedicated to providing high-quality swimming instruction and promoting water safety within our community. 
The purpose of this Letter is to explore potential partnership opportunities between our swimming school and your esteemed organization Florida Gold Coast Swimming. We believe that by combining our efforts, we can create synergies that will benefit both organizations, as well as the broader community. 
At N…..IM LLC, we pride ourselves on our experienced and certified instructors, state-of-the-art facilities, and a curriculum designed to cater to swimmers of all ages and skill levels. Our programs range from beginner lessons for children to advanced training for competitive swimmers. 
We would be honored to collaborate with your organization in various capacities, such as: 
1. Offering swimming lessons and water safety programs to your members or constituents at discounted rates. 
2. Participating in community outreach initiatives and events to promote swimming and water safety. 
3. Providing training and mentorship opportunities for aspiring swimming instructors or coaches in Modern and Cutting-Edge “Mindful Immersion” Techniques Based on Child Development Biomechanics. 
4. Exploring joint marketing and promotion efforts to raise awareness about the benefits of swimming. 
I would welcome the opportunity to discuss our proposal in greater detail and explore ways in which we can work together to achieve our shared goals. 
Please feel free to contact me at N….impro@gmail.com to schedule a meeting or discuss further. See Attachment 28 - the Partnership Letter N….im LLC & Florida Gold Coast Swimming, Attachment 29 - the Partnership Letter N…im LLC Mary Trujillo, Attachment 30 - the Partnership Letter N….. LLC Public Records Custodian Parks.
However, the Petitioner received two Letters expressing interest in collaboration from the Director of Business Development at Swim Right Academy in Miami and from SWIM MALAHIT MIAMI LLC.
Thus, the Director of Business Development at Swim Right Academy, in his Letter, proposes
We highly value the reputation of N….im LLC as one of the leading swimming schools in our region. Your experience and successful programs are an excellent complement to our activities, and we believe that cooperation between our organizations could bring mutual benefits.
We have familiarized ourselves with your method, which offers the use of fairy tale stories, water exercises and games, conditional signals and gestures. We see that this method is not limited to solving one learning problem, but rather offers a comprehensive approach to teaching and health improvement of children. We are very interested in its application in our classes.
We are open to discussing various forms of cooperation, including but not limited to joint training programs, the exchange of expertise and resources, as well as opportunities for mutual promotion and marketing. We are confident that by combining our efforts, we will be able to achieve even higher results and provide even better quality services to our students.
I would be delighted to meet with you in person to discuss the details of potential cooperation and address any questions you may have. See Attachment 40 - the Letter of interest from the Director of Business Development Swim Right Academy.
Pavel K…..ov, the owner of SWIM MAL….T MIAMI LLC, is also interested in collaborating with the Petitioner, as he mentions in his Letter.
Looking ahead, we are excited about the prospect of continued collaboration with Nadezhda. As we embark on our ambitious plans to organize more frequent competitions for all age groups and explore new initiatives such as open water swimming events, we believe that Nadezhda’s expertise and leadership will be invaluable assets to our community. See Attachment 19 - the Letter of interest from Pavel K…..ov.
Additionally, the Petitioner is listed as a Swimming coach and instructor on the website of the M….it Swimming School. The Petitioner presents herself as having Higher pedagogical education. 9 years of coaching experience, Candidate for Master of Sports in swimming, Work experience in Russia, Turkey, Thailand, and Sri Lanka and that it works with Children (from 0+ to 6 years old). See Attachment 41 - About the “Ma….t” Swimming School, page 7.
The provided information indicates that the Petitioner will continue to work as a swimming instructor and founder of N…..im LLC. Her plans include offering swimming lessons for various age groups, including infants, children, and adults. The main emphasis is on improving physical health, strengthening muscles, enhancing circulation, and overall well-being. For infants, swimming contributes to muscle development, stimulates circulation, and strengthens the immune system. For children, swimming improves breathing, cognitive functions, and the balance of the nervous system. Adults benefit from swimming through muscle development, joint strengthening, and overall physical fitness improvement.
Going beyond traditional swimming lessons, the applicant intends to open a mobile swimming school franchise targeting cities with high demand and significant child populations. Franchisees will undergo special training to work with children with special needs, providing individualized instruction and continuous quality control. 
For effective operations management, the applicant plans to utilize advanced platforms such as Monday.com for sales, customer management, and quality control. Franchise development and support strategies will include training, marketing assistance, legal support, and operational consultations.
Additionally, there are plans to organize both offline and online training programs for swimming instructors. Offline training in Florida and other states will cover theoretical foundations and practical recommendations tailored to the needs of children. Online training will provide a convenient platform offering educational materials, video lessons, as well as forums for discussion and support for instructors. 
Moreover, the applicant plans to organize training camps and intensives for instructors to deepen their knowledge and practical skills in swimming instruction. Establishing partnerships with local swimming clubs and organizations will contribute to the recruitment and development of instructors.
ПРИМЕР 2 
The Petitioner's proposed Area of expertise is Influencer and LGBT Content Creator. She is actively developing her social networks and video blog, noting an increase in the number of subscribers from the United States.
Statistics show promising prospects for LGBT influencers in America. Her fame, unique skills, and significant experience in blogging represent great value for the American market and economy.
Another direction the Petitioner plans to pursue in America is providing psychological support to LGBT immigrants from post-Soviet countries. The Petitioner already successfully conducts group meetings with women from Russia and the CIS and intends to further develop this direction, considering the high demand.
In New York, her story and work as one of Russia's leading LGBT bloggers has inspired many influential figures. Their support became an incentive for the further development of her activities, influencing the LGBT community both in Russia and in the United States.
Her unique talent as an LGBT blogger will be a valuable asset to the US marketing and media industry, promoting the protection of rights, psychological support and social adaptation of LGBT immigrants.
The extensive list of collaborative projects with various well-known international brands such as Gucci, L'Oréal, Starbucks, Benetton, and others, attests to the commercial success of the Petitioner. Her advertising campaigns are commercially successful and bring in stable and high income. Over the past six months, the Petitioner has earned over $100,000 through her work in the media and advertising. This is an unprecedented achievement for a Russian-speaking LGBT blogger. The Petitioner is a well-known media personality in Russia, which makes her a sought-after blogger in the LGBT market segment.
On August 17, 2021, an agreement was concluded between McCann Worldgroup (Russia) and the Petitioner to advertise L'Oréal products. According to the agreement, the Petitioner undertakes to create and publish on the Petitioner's personal Instagram account at https://www.instagram.com/larkicheva/?hl=ru 1 (one) video with a duration of up to 60 (sixty) seconds under the code name StandUp in the Instagram Stories format, and 1 (one) photo post under the code name StandUp (hereinafter collectively referred to as the Publications). See Attachment 20 to the original petition - Cooperation agreement with  L'Oréal Paris.
We have also attached a letter of recommendation from Liliya Lua, a Project Manager at McCann Worldgroup (Russia), in which she states that
On August 17, 2021, we collaborated with Ms. Anastasiia Larkicheva, one of the most successful LGBT bloggers from Russia. Ms. Larkicheva published an Instagram post and story for our client L’Oréal Paris on her Instagram page @larkicheva.
Collaborating with her not only increases the revenue and visibility of any brand but also contributes to the development of the entire beauty and fashion industry worldwide, as her advertising, regardless of the product, influences broad masses. Thanks to her unique style and influence as a blogger, the products she advertises become popular.
In the future, we are ready to continue our collaboration with her, considering the successful results we have achieved. We are convinced that she is a unique blogger with a special approach, as we choose only the best of the best for collaboration. See Attachment 48 - Letter of cooperation with the L_Oréal Paris brand.
Gucci. Arthur Eov, the PR Director at Aizel.Ru also states in his letter of recommendation that
Collaborating with her not only boosts the revenues and visibility of our brand but also contributes to the overall development of the beauty and fashion industry worldwide, as her advertising reaches the masses regardless of the product. Thanks to her unique style and influence as a blogger, the objects of her advertising become popular.
In the future, we are ready to continue collaborating with her, considering the successful results we have achieved. With none of the other bloggers have we achieved such success, so we plan to continue working with her in the long term. We have found her to be a unique blogger with a special approach, as we choose only the best of the best for advertising.See Attachment 49 - Letter of cooperation with the Gucci brand.
BENETTON. On June 29, 2021, an Agreement for the advertising of Benetton perfumes was concluded between the Petitioner and the SETTERS advertising agency. See Attachment 22 to the original petition - Cooperation agreement with the BENETTON brand.
Evgeniya Rosva, the Group Head of Influence Projects at SETTERS writes in an updated letter in which she claims
Thanks to her creative approach and ability to create attention-grabbing content, Ms. Larkicheva has not only become a leader in her field but also one of the foremost influential figures in the world of blogging and social media.
I am confident that our journey with Ms. Larkicheva has just begun. It has been a pleasure working with Ms. Larkicheva and we are looking forward to more joint projects in the future. Thus, I am certain that Ms. Larkicheva will be a great asset to the marketing industry of the United States.See Attachment 50 - Letter from the SETTERS communication agency.
Meta Platforms, Inc. On December 22, 2022, a Meta Brand Advertising Agreement was entered into between the Petitioner and Meta Platforms, Inc.
According to the Letter of Cooperation, the Petitioner must 
In addition to any other obligations agreed to between you and a Brand pursuant to a BC Deal under this Letter, you must post a minimum of one (1) shoppable Instagram Reel (the “Minimum Required Content”) in connection with the applicable BC Deal, and such Instagram Reel shall (i) he posted prior to the Creator Deadline (defined below), (ii) include a shopping “call to action” in the caption, (iii) be cross-posted and/or cross-shared to your Instagram Feed and Instagram Stories from your Instagram account, and (iv) remain fully accessible on your Instagram profile grid for a minimum of one (1) month after it is initially posted. You will complete the Minimum Required Content and all other obligations under the applicable BC Deal (including attributing all such content to the applicable BC Deal) prior to the Creator Deadline (defined below). See Attachment 37 to the original petition - Letter of cooperation with Meta Platforms.
AloYoga is an iconic American brand of high-end yoga, fitness, and stylish streetwear for women and men. Since November 2022, the Petitioner has been collaborating with the AloYoga brand.
We have attached an updated letter of recommendation from Tajsa Tapp, a Marketing Coordinator for Alo Yoga, in which she notes
Collaborating with her not only contributes to increasing the revenue and recognition of our brand but also overall promotes the development of the entire beauty and fashion industry worldwide, as her advertising receives widespread dissemination. Her unique style and approach make the advertised product popular regardless of what she promotes.
In the future, we are ready to continue collaborating with her, considering the successful outcomes. The results of our collaboration with Ms. Larkicheva are notably high compared to other influencers, so we plan to work with her in the long term, as we choose the best of the best influencers for advertising. See Attachment 57 - Letter of recommendation from Tajsiana Tapp.
The Petitioner signed with leading New York production agency VX Media on January 8, 2024. See Attachment 18 to the original petition - Contracts with VX Media. 
This collaboration was a big step forward for her, opening the door to new opportunities and professional growth. Additionally, this contract confirms her relevance and value in the US blogger market. 
Cooperation with VX Media will allow her to participate in large-scale projects, work with global brands and, possibly, launch her own product lines. She also plans to actively use social media platforms to promote critical topics such as sustainability, inclusion and support for local communities.
We have attached a letter of recommendation from Valerie Zhang, Manager of the production center for bloggers VX Med which states
Anastasia Laa is a well-known and creative blogger with a significant influence, addressing LGBT community issues, personal life events, fashion, style, and travel on her media platforms. Thanks to the social significance and high-quality content, combined with creative and trustworthy communication with her followers, Anastasia quickly gained popularity and recognition in Russia and other countries. Today, she is rightfully considered the most famous and influential LGBT blogger in the CIS countries.
Her primary audience consists of young, modern, and successful women with average to high incomes. Additionally, Anastasia stands out among other bloggers for her high audience engagement: readers and viewers trust her, actively view posts, photos, and videos, participate in discussions, and give likes.
Anastasia is a sought-after and commercially successful blogger, attracting interest from leading global brands. That is why in 2023, we invited Anastasia to a business partnership and signed a contract. Today, major cosmetic, fragrance, fashion, and accessory manufacturers from America and Europe offer Anastasia the opportunity to promote their products on her social media page and in YouTube videos.
Anastasia is a sought-after and commercially successful blogger, attracting interest from leading global brands. That is why in 2023, we invited Anastasia to a business partnership and signed a contract. Today, major cosmetic, fragrance, fashion, and accessory manufacturers from America and Europe offer Anastasia the opportunity to promote their products on her social media page and in YouTube videos.
We are interested in a long-term collaboration with Anastasia and are thrilled that it has provided a powerful boost to her career development in America as a popular LGBT blogger. See Attachment 64 - Letter of Recommendation from VX MEDIA.
With 10 years of blogging experience, the Petitioner possesses valuable connections and a strong desire to grow and work hard. The Petitioner believes in her abilities and is ready to overcome any challenges, striving for new heights in the world of blogging in the United States. This is a new stage in her career, and she is determined to make it something greater and inspiring.
In the future, the Petitioner plans to continue collaborating with major international brands, solidifying her position as a leading blogger. Her goal is to create unique content that resonates with her audience and attracts new followers. The Petitioner also intends to participate in major international projects, utilize her platforms to promote important topics, and launch her own product lines
DOCUMENTATION TO ESTABLISH THAT THE BENEFICIARY'S ENTRY WILL SUBSTANTIALLY BENEFIT PROSPECTIVELY THE UNITED STATES
Необходимо показать, каким образом въезд бенефициара принесет существенную пользу Соединенным Штатам в перспективе. В петиции не указано, что въезд бенефициара принесет существенную пользу Соединенным Штатам в перспективе. Пожалуйста, представьте доказательства того, что въезд бенефициара принесет существенную пользу Соединенным Штатам в перспективе. Доказательства, которые могут быть представлены для удовлетворения этого требования, включают, но не ограничиваются ими:
Письма от нынешних или потенциальных работодателей или лиц, работающих в сфере деятельности бенефициара;
Другие доказательства, объясняющие, как работа бенефициара будет выгодна и полезна для интересов Соединенных Штатов на национальном уровне; или
Заявление от бенефициара с подробным описанием планов о том, как его работа в перспективе принесет существенную пользу Соединенным Штатам.
В данному критерию можно повторить
Job Offers если клиент планирует работать по найму 
трудовые договоры; или 
Business Plan, если клиент планирует открывать компанию;
Письма о заинтересованности
Заявление бенефициара с подробным описанием планов по продолжению работы в США.
Важно, если у клиента есть кейс EB2 NIW, то часть Area of expertise в части Business Plan или планов на будущее нужно перенести и сюда. То есть планы на будущее в двух кейсах должны быть идентичными в EB1 и в EB2 NIW
Поскольку практически во всех RFE офицеры запрашивают доказательства того, что клиент продолжить свою деятельность на территории США, в этой части EB1 прикладываем Job Offers либо Business Plan.
ПРИМЕР 1. ИЗ ОДОБРЕННОГО ПОСЛЕ RFE КЕЙСА
While water is the most frequently consumed beverage in the country, with 66% of Americans drinking it daily, coffee is close behind, with 63% of Americans having a mug of joe each morning. This means over half of the nation consumes coffee on a regular basis, which is the highest rate in about a decade.
Coffee may be the second most popular drink among Americans because the caffeinated beverage has been known to decrease tiredness and increase alertness in the morning. Tea, which is also commonly caffeinated, is a close third, with 47% of the nation’s population pouring a cup of tea each day.
Each day, U.S. citizens consume a total of 400 million cups of coffee. Individually, an American coffee drinker consumes about three cups of coffee per day. These numbers add up, considering about 150 million Americans are avid coffee drinkers. Drinking three cups of coffee each day keeps Americans within the U.S. Food and Drug Association (FDA) recommended caffeine limit of 400 milligrams per day, which amounts to about four cups of regular coffee.
Add up all of those millions of cups of coffee consumed by Americans each day, and you’ll get a yearly average of 146 billion cups of coffee for the country. Per capita, the annual U.S. coffee consumption is about nine pounds. Amazingly, this only lands the U.S. at 25th on the list of worldwide annual coffee consumption. Finland leads global coffee consumption per capita with around 26.5 pounds annually. 
The Petitioner’s coffee shop, A….i, directly caters to Americans' demand for high-quality coffee and a cozy atmosphere. The Petitioner’s chain of coffee shops offers a wide selection of coffee beverages prepared by professional baristas using only the finest coffee beans. Additionally, the Petitioner’s establishments provide various tasty desserts and snacks, allowing customers to enjoy the high-quality coffee experience fully. 
Along with powering you through your day, coffee helps power the U.S. economy. With revenues reaching over $80 billion, the U.S. has the largest coffee market worldwide by far. As if it weren’t contributing enough to the economy already, the U.S. coffee market is projected to grow by nearly 5% by 2025.
These numbers mean coffee influences communities across the country in amazing ways, including generating tax dollars and creating more job opportunities. Specifically, coffee creates multiple types of jobs, from barista positions to coffee roasters. Coffee also touches other industries, such as increasing the demand for cream and dairy farmworkers to boost the need for more supermarket workers to stock shelves with coffee and coffee-related products. See Attachment 1 - How Many People Drink Coffee? 11 Coffee Drinking Statistics.
The progress achieved in the management of the Petitioner's business, tax payments, and creation of new job opportunities aligns with the support found among thousands of other entrepreneurs. Vice President Harris, during her address on small business issues in Los Angeles, CA, stated: 
So, today, we honor our small businesses. 
And it has been a passion of mine for many, many years to support these leaders.
You know, our business leaders are — they are — they are community leaders, they’re civic leaders, they hire locally, they mentor.  And this business is no — no different than those who are family-owned, multigenerational — who are invested in the community and the community counts on.
And so, we’re here to honor the work that’s happening, also understanding that our small businesses in the United States actually employ almost half of the workforce that is not in — in public work in the government. 
So, we’re talking about a gigantic, huge workforce that is contributing to the economy, paying taxes, and doing the work that is about strengthening our economy and, by extension, our country. See Attachment 2 - Remarks by the Vice President Harris on Small Business Saturday.
In 2018, upon securing a work permit, the Petitioner embarked on a journey of self-employment, diligently fulfilling his tax obligations to the country’s budget while serving as a driver for Uber and Amazon, delivering orders. See Attachment 23 to the original petition - Amazon’s Form Reference ID.
Simultaneously, he delved into social media management for multiple coffee shops, leveraging the Petitioner’s expertise to provide consultation on startups and small business development. Notably, his guidance played a pivotal role in the expansion of POETICA COFFEE INC, which now boasts 10 outlets. See Attachment 24 to the original petition - the Letter of Recommendation from Parviz Mu…..lov.
Furthermore, the Petitioner offered invaluable mentorship to Velvette Brew Company, providing strategic advice on social media, finance, and broader business matters. See Attachment 25 to the original petition - the Letter of Recommendation from Kirill Likov.
In March 2021, the Petitioner laid the foundation for his company, A….i Corp, and meticulously crafted a business plan while concurrently scouting for a suitable location to open his first coffee shop. We have attached Certificate of Authority, Online Filing Receipt and Employer Identification Number as Attachment 26 to the original petition. See Attachment 26 to the original - Employer Identification Number. 
After an exhaustive search spanning over seven months, he secured a prime spot in Manhattan in August 2021. Despite the challenges posed by the pandemic-induced lockdown, he successfully negotiated a lease agreement and officially sealed the deal in October. See Attachments 27 and 28 to the original petition - Lease Agreement 336 West 37th and the Letter of Recommendation from Alexis DiVincenti.
Undeterred by adversity, the Petitioner embarked on the arduous task of preparing the premises investing his personal savings into equipment, interior design, and initial inventory. His unwavering belief in Manhattan’s resilience amid the pandemic underscored his determination.
On November 15, 2021, A…..i Coffee Shop welcomed its first patrons, capitalizing on the festive spirit of December. Despite initial post-pandemic setbacks, he remained steadfast, intensifying social media marketing efforts and committing long hours to ensure the cafe’s success. With the return of tourists in March, business prospects brightened. See Attachment 29 to the original petition - Screens A….ci Coffee Shop.
After the official end of the pandemic in 2022, significant strides were made in expanding the team. The entrepreneur hired his first employee, crucial for weekend coverage, marking a pivotal moment in the company’s growth trajectory. As conditions continued to improve, he further bolstered his workforce by bringing on board three additional individuals, reflecting the organization's burgeoning progress. 
Transitioning into a new phase of leadership in 2022, the Petitioner embraced a more strategic role, relinquishing operational responsibilities to focus on overarching management Area of expertises. Despite this shift, he remained steadfast in his commitment to driving growth through continuous advertising efforts and proactive business promotion. Moreover, he embarked on a quest to broaden the company's horizons, initiating the search for a second coffee shop location.
Amidst these strategic maneuvers, the Petitioner continued to extend his expertise to other small business owners, offering invaluable consultancy services. Advocating for eco-conscious practices, the Petitioner championed the adoption of environmentally friendly products, such as biodegradable cups, as part of his unwavering dedication to conservation and environmental stewardship. His staunch opposition to plastic usage served as a beacon for aspiring entrepreneurs, inspiring them to emulate his sustainability-focused approach. See Attachments 30-33 to the original petition - the Letter of Recommendation from Andrey Al….drov, the Letter of Recommendation from Julio Villamar, the Letter of Recommendation from Va…..ev, Photo of a glass.
In January 2023, his forward-thinking approach bore fruit as he secured a 5-year lease for a second coffee shop location strategically situated in Manhattan. With a hands-on approach, the Petitioner personally oversaw the outfitting and decoration of the new establishment, ensuring its readiness for the grand opening in February 2023. Despite encountering initial challenges, the resilience of the entrepreneur and the Petitioner’s team shone through, with March witnessing a remarkable upswing in sales, nearly matching those of the flagship coffee shop. The expansion also necessitated further recruitment, with three additional hires bringing the total number of employees to seven, underscoring the company’s commitment to growth and progress. See Attachment 35 to the original petition - the Letter of Recommendation from Landlord Reference.
The Petitioner has secured a lease for a third coffee shop, poised for imminent launch, a testament to his unwavering commitment to growth and innovation. See Attachment 36 to the original petition – A…..ci_Executed Lease.
His exemplary rapport with landlords, punctual rent payments, and meticulous property upkeep has cemented his standing as a trusted tenant. See Attachment 37 to the original petition - the Letter of Recommendation from Veronica Ifrah.
Additionally, he collaborates with Impact Food Distributing Inc., Abbotsford Road Coffee, and Quick Fit Bites, fostering mutually beneficial partnerships. See Attachments 38-40 to the original petition - Letters of Recommendation from Logan Kedwell, Letters of Recommendation from Felix K….nir, the Letter of Recommendation from Aleksandra M….ska.
His passion for entrepreneurship extends to his digital platforms, where he shares insights with 20,000 YouTube subscribers and maintains an active presence on Instagram, inspiring aspiring business owners. See Attachments 41 and 42 to the original petition - Screens from the YouTube channel and the Petitioner (@arslansblog) - Instagram photos and videos.
The gross receipts or sales of the first coffee shop in 2021 amounted to $71,105 USD, marking a modest beginning. However, by 2022, the Petitioner’s relentless efforts propelled the business to remarkable heights, with sales soaring to $432,089 USD. See Attachment 63 and 64 to the original petition – A…….I CORP 2021 Tax Return and A……I CORP 2022 Tax Return. 
Inspired by his own success, the Petitioner embarked on an ambitious expansion of its business, opening a second café in early 2023 and aiming to open a third. In July 2023, the Petitioner entered into a lease agreement with JOHNS LLC for a space in Brooklyn, NY, intended for the café. Please see Attachment 36 to the original petition – A…..I_Executed Lease. The gross receipts or sales of the Company of the Petitioner for the year 2023 amounted to $911,465 USD. See Attachment 3 – A…….I CORP 2023 Tax Return.
Committed to upholding principles of responsibility and integrity, the Petitioner pledges to adhere to all tax laws and obligations of the United States, recognizing the significance of contributing to public funds. Firmly believing in the importance of environmental conservation, the Petitioner prioritizes the use of sustainable products in their coffee shops, underscoring a dedication to preserving nature's gifts for future generations. 
Operating out of three prime locations in New York City, the Petitioner envisions further growth, with plans to expand by an additional 5-8 locations in the coming year. This expansion not only promises to create new jobs but also stands to bolster the US economy as a whole. Emphasizing a commitment to social responsibility, the Petitioner views job creation for US citizens as a vital aspect of their business venture, providing stable employment and opportunities for professional development.
In July 2023, the Petitioner and his team launched the company’s website, inviting customers to immerse themselves in the rich aroma of freshly brewed coffee. Through the platform, patrons can explore a variety of specialty drinks while placing orders for exclusive coffee blends. The user-friendly interface also provides access to product prices and location addresses, enhancing the overall customer experience. The website, available at https://arvacicoffee.co/, serves as a testament to the Petitioner’s dedication to innovation and customer satisfaction. See Attachment 68 to the original petition - Website Screenshots
In summary, the achievements and successful business strategy of the petitioner convincingly demonstrate that their arrival in the United States will bring significant benefits to the country in the long term. They are a potential source of new jobs, timely pay taxes, contribute to the country’s economic development, and make a contribution to environmental conservation.  
Thus, we have shown that the petitioner’s entry would have substantial benefits for the U.S.
CONCLUSION
In the EB1  case, the strict requirement is that the Petitioner meets at least three of the ten criteria for extraordinary ability. Petitioners can provide all other documents of their choice in order to prove the eligibility by a preponderance of the evidence that he is eligible. Pursuant to Section 291 of the INA, whenever any person makes an application for an immigration benefit, he shall bear the burden of proof to establish eligibility. Accordingly, the petitioner must prove by preponderance of the evidence (See Matter E-M-, 20 I. & N. Dec. 77 (BIA 1989). 
First, preponderance of the evidence is not evidence that must establish beyond a doubt that the applicant is eligible under section 245A of the Act. In other words, the director can still have doubts but, nevertheless, the applicant can establish eligibility. Second, preponderance of the evidence is not the clear, unequivocal, and convincing evidence applicable in deportation proceedings (See Woodby v. INS, 385 U.S. 276 (1966) (Service must prove by clear, unequivocal, and convincing evidence that the facts alleged as grounds for deportation are true). An alien does not have to prove by clear, unequivocal, and convincing evidence that he has established eligibility under section 245A of the Act. Preponderance of the evidence requires a lesser showing than these two standards. Id.79.
How much of a showing is sufficient to establish eligibility by a preponderance of the evidence will often turn upon the factual circumstances of each case. There are no magic words or mathematical formulas that can describe a preponderance of the evidence so it can be applied mechanically in every case. Nonetheless, when we consider that the purpose of evidence is to ascertain the truth, then we can make certain generalizations. For example, when something has to be proved beyond a reasonable doubt, the proof must demonstrate that something must be almost certainly true. And when something has to be proved by clear and convincing evidence, the proof must demonstrate that it is highly probable true. But, when something is to be established by a preponderance of the evidence it is sufficient that the proof only establishes that it is probably true. Id.79-80.
I am confident and hope that the evidence contained in the initial report, as well as the additional documentary evidence presented herein, unequivocally establishes my eligibility for an EB-1 immigrant visa.
Therefore, I respectfully request you to consider and render a favorable decision on my immigration application with EB-1 visa as a  Legal Assistant.
Thank you for your consideration.
Respectfully submitted,
___________________________
Имя и Фамилия клиента